skip navigational links DOL Seal - Link to DOL Home Page U.S. Department of Labor Office of Administrative Law Judges Images of lawyers, judges, courthouse, gavel
www.oalj.dol.gov [skip navigational links] Search: ____________________ [go_button.gif]
December 9, 2003 DOL Home 
United States Department of Labor Office of Administrative Law Judges Law Library __________________________________________________________________
DICTIONARY OF OCCUPATIONAL TITLES (4th Ed., Rev. 1991) -- OCCUPATIONAL GROUP ARRANGEMENT __________________________________________________________________
TITLE PAGE HOW TO READ PARTS OF AN OCCUPATIONAL TITLE __________________________________________________________________
5 PROCESSING OCCUPATIONS 522.685-098 to 529.685-138
This category includes occupations concerned with refining, mixing, compounding, chemically treating, heat treating, or similarly working materials and products.
Knowledge of a process and adherence to formulas or other specifications are required in some degree.
Vats, stills, ovens, furnaces, mixing machines, crushers, grinders, and related equipment or machines are usually involved.
__________________________________________________________________
522.685-098 STILL OPERATOR (agriculture; can.
&
Tends batch stills and related equipment to separate and condense vitamins or oils from fruits or mint hay: Pumps or pours specified quantities of liquids into still.
Observes thermostat and sets controls on instrument panel to maintain specified temperatures throughout distillation cycle and to control condensation.
Draws samples of distillant for laboratory analysis.
Observes color of distillant to determine when distillation is completed.
Records operating data, such as weight, yield of product, gauge readings, and number of batches distilled.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M1 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
522.685-102 VACUUM-CONDITIONER OPERATOR (tobacco) alternate titles: steam-pressure-chamber operator
Tends vacuum conditioner (steam-pressure chamber) that moistens opened hogsheads of tobacco for further processing: Opens chamber door and pushes hogsheads of tobacco into chamber or starts hydraulic lift that moves hogsheads into chamber.
Closes chamber door, starts vacuum pump, and turns valve to admit steam into chamber.
Observes gauges and dials on control panel to determine when temperature and air, steam, and vacuum pressure reach specified levels to force steam through tobacco.
Removes hogsheads from chamber.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
522.685-106 WRINGER OPERATOR (tobacco) alternate titles: casing-wringer operator; wrapper dipper
Tends machine that saturates tobacco leaves with $T3casing fluid$T1 and removes excess fluid from leaves: Admits fluid to vat.
Starts conveyor that feeds leaves through fluid and to wringer rolls of machine, or dumps leaves into vat, allows leaves to absorb moisture for specified time, and feeds moistened leaves between wringer rolls.
Removes clogged leaves from rollers, using stick.
Cleans rollers and vat, using steam and airhose.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
522.685-110 YEAST-FERMENTATION ATTENDANT (food prep., nec)
Tends fermentation tanks to propagate yeast in molasses wort: Opens valves to admit specified amounts of seed yeast and molasses wort into tanks.
Dumps, pours, or meters measured quantities of nitrogen and phosphate to supplement diet of yeast.
Pumps air into tank to aerate wort.
Sets thermostat to maintain prescribed temperature levels in fermentation tanks.
Tests wort for acidity, using pH meter, and adds specified chemicals to maintain required acidity.
Adds additional wort and chemicals to tank, as yeast concentration increases, to facilitate yeast growth.
Pumps wort with yeast cream (concentrated yeast suspension) to yeast-separating department.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
522.685-114 BARLEY STEEPER (beverage) alternate titles: steeper
Tends steeping tank that saturates barley with water preparatory to germination: Moves lever to open slide gate of weighing tank.
Dumps barley into tank and weighs out specified amount.
Turns handle to open and load barley into steeping tank.
Turns water and air valves to fill steeping tank with water, remove chaff, and aerate barley.
Reads and copies water and air temperature data to maintain record of steeping cycle.
Drains and refills tank during cycle.
Turns handles to open steeping tank and dumps steeped barley onto conveyor.
May tend equipment to germinate barley [GERMINATION WORKER (beverage) 522.585-014].
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 2 DLU: 78
522.686-010 CHIP WASHER (beverage)
Shovels beechwood chips (used to impart flavor to beer) from fermenting tank into cart.
Pushes cart into automatic washer and starts washer.
Removes cart from washer and shovels washed chips onto floor of fermenting tank.
GOE: 06.04.39 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
522.686-014 GENERAL HELPER (food prep., nec) alternate titles: fermenter helper; yeast stacker
Dumps chemical nutrients into yeast fermentation tanks to supplement diet of yeast cells.
Takes samples of wort from tank for laboratory analysis.
Cleans fermentation tanks, using steam and water.
Transfers ingredients, materials, and finished products to production, storage, and shipping area, using handtrucks.
GOE: 06.04.40 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
522.687-010 BARREL FILLER I (beverage) alternate titles: checker
Fills metal or wooden containers with distilled liquors, preparatory to aging: Rolls metal drum or wooden barrel, with bunghole side up, under spigot attached to storage tank.
Inserts spigot nozzle into bunghole of container and opens valve to fill container with whiskey, gin, or vodka.
Removes spigot nozzle from filled container when spigot has shut off automatically.
Hammers bung into bunghole of barrel or screws threaded metal bung into bunghole of metal drum, using wrench.
Rolls filled container aside for storing.
When filling metal drums only, may be known as Drum Filler (beverage).
GOE: 06.04.36 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
522.687-014 BRINER (can.
&
Immerses fresh fish fillets in brine solution to condition them for wrapping or freezing: Places fish fillets in wire basket and submerges basket in salt and water solution for specified time.
Removes basket from brine tank and dumps fillets on conveyor belt.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
522.687-018 BULKER (tobacco)
Fills $T3bulking cell$T1 with stemmed and cased tobacco: Directs conveyor tube into cell and spreads tobacco in cell, using handfork.
Positions hydraulic press over tobacco and pulls lever to activate press to pack tobacco into bulk for fermentation.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
522.687-022 FILLER ROOM ATTENDANT (tobacco)
Spreads filler tobacco leaves on trays after conditioning (wetting) to allow air to circulate between leaves.
Feels leaves to determine moisture content and empties trays into boxes or cans when leaves are at stage specified for processing.
May fill cans with tobacco [CAN FILLER (tobacco)].
May moisten tobacco [LEAF CONDITIONER (tobacco)].
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
522.687-026 LEAF CONDITIONER (tobacco) alternate titles: casing wetter; tobacco conditioner; tobacco curer; tobacco dipper
Moistens (conditions or cases) hands of tobacco to make leaves pliable for processing: Removes hands from receiving box and dips them into water or sprays water over leaves.
Stacks leaves, stem down, on drainboard and covers leaves with cloth or paper.
May pack drained leaves in cases and transfer cases to steam or humidifier room, using handtruck.
May mix various grades and types of tobacco prior to conditioning.
May be designated according to type of tobacco as Binder Caser (tobacco); Wrapper Caser (tobacco).
May feel tobacco leaves from steam room and moisten butts and tops of hands that are too dry and be designated Cigar-Tobacco Rehandler (tobacco).
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
522.687-030 LEAF-CONDITIONER HELPER (tobacco) alternate titles: caser helper
Assists LEAF CONDITIONER (tobacco) to condition tobacco leaves.
Performs other duties as described under HELPER (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
522.687-034 PICKLER (meat products) alternate titles: curing packer; green-meat packer; vat overhauler; vat packer
Loads cuts of meat into pickling vats or barrels to cure meat preparatory to smoking: Packs and arranges meat in vats or barrels by hand or with meat hook to ensure maximum saturation.
Turns valves to admit curing solution into vats or pours in solution by hand.
Covers vat or barrel to keep meat protected and submerged in solution.
Sticks trier (hook) into meat and smells trier to determine degree of curing.
Opens valves or pulls bungs to drain vats and barrels, and removes cured meat for further processing.
Dumps frozen meat in water tank to defrost it preparatory to curing.
May roll barrels to rearrange meat and ensure maximum saturation.
May flush or blow marrow from ham bones.
May clean vats with water and steam hoses.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
522.687-038 TURNER (can.
&
Rearranges containers of fruit stacked in tiers in ripening room to expose all fruit equally to room temperature during ripening period.
May truck fruit in and out of ripening room.
GOE: 06.04.40 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
522.687-042 WRAPPER-HANDS SPRAYER (tobacco) alternate titles: tobacco sprayer
Moistens hands of tobacco wrapper leaves with water, using spraygun, to make leaves pliable for processing.
Feels leaves to determine whether moisture content is within prescribed limits.
Weighs specific amounts of leaves and places leaves in containers for untier.
Records amounts of wrapper and binder leaves used in making cigars.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
522.687-046 FISH ROE PROCESSOR (can.
&
Performs any combination of following tasks concerned with cannery processing of fish roe: Presses headless fish against work surface to ascertain sex of fish by presence or absence of milt.
Inserts hand into body cavity of female fish, feels along ventral area of body to locate vent, and cups hand to remove viscera and egg skeins (membrane-enclosed ovaries, tissue, and fish roe).
Separates viscera and organs from egg skeins by hand.
Discards viscera and organs and places egg skeins in baskets for weighing.
Weighs baskets containing egg skeins, using scales, and records totals on tally sheets.
Dumps basket of egg skeins on work surface, and examines egg skeins for imperfections, such as blood saturation, immature eggs, and torn membranes.
Separates egg skeins, according to size and species of fish.
Places acceptable egg skeins in containers for reweighing.
Rinses containers of egg skeins with water, using water hose, and dips containers in mild saline solution to rinse egg skeins prior to brining.
Works under direction of FISH ROE TECHNICIAN (can.
&
522.384-010 to fill brining tanks, dump egg skeins into tanks, remove processed egg skeins, and pack egg skeins for shipment, following prescribed procedures.
May slit underside of fish before removing egg skeins, using knife.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 86
523 HEATING, RENDERING, MELTING, DRYING, COOLING, FREEZING, AND RELATED OCCUPATIONS
This group includes occupations concerned with subjecting materials or products to heat and cold for a specific purpose, such as removing moisture or fat content, or preserving and storing them by refrigeration.
523.131-010 TESTING AND ANALYSIS DEPARTMENT SUPERVISOR (can.
&
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in sorting and packing nuts, and inspects sampling of nuts to estimate percentage that will be marketable from each delivery: Selects random sample of nuts from each delivery, places sample in containers, and attaches identification tag to container.
Places nuts in drier to remove specified percentage of moisture.
Weighs nuts before and after drying and records weight lost.
Places nuts on perforated plate through which nuts pass into separate containers, according to size.
Cracks nuts and examines them for blanks, worms, and shriveled centers.
Segregates salable nuts, weighs nuts, and records percentage of marketable products.
May explain procedures for estimating percentage of marketable products to growers.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.01.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L4 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
523.132-010 SUPERVISOR, CHAR HOUSE (sugar 
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in regenerating bone-char, charcoal, and diatomaceous earth used as filtering media for sugar liquor: Orders emptying of filters, and transferring of char between char-house by CHAR PULLER (grain-feed mills; sugar 
Directs kiln operator in maintaining specified temperature in kiln and flow-rate of material through kiln.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
523.137-010 SUPERVISOR, ICE HOUSE (food prep., nec)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in filling cans, sucking cores, and pulling and dumping cans in ice plant.
Performs duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L2 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
523.362-010 COCOA-BEAN ROASTER I (sugar 
Operates one or more roasters to remove moisture and impart specified color and flavor to cocoa beans: Adjusts thermostat and fuel valve to heat roasters to specified temperature.
Observes temperature chart to ascertain heat pattern of roaster.
Pulls handle to open hopper and drop beans into roaster.
Starts roaster cylinder rotating to roast beans evenly.
Examines sample of beans for color, dryness, or brittleness after specified roasting cycle, and tastes bean to judge if flavor conforms to standard.
Adjusts roaster flame and dampers to control circulation of hot air on basis of evaluation of sample.
Pulls handle when desired degree of roasting is reached to discharge beans onto conveyor that transfers beans to cracking and fanning machine.
Records amounts of beans roasted.
May tend bean-cleaning machine.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M1 L1 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
523.362-014 DRIER OPERATOR (food prep., nec)
Controls equipment that dries macaroni according to laboratory specifications: Turns dials and opens steam valves on panelboard to regulate temperature, humidity, and drying time in preliminary, secondary, and final drying chambers, according to outside atmospheric conditions, specific product requirements, and drying stage.
Enters chambers and feels macaroni to determine if product is drying according to specifications, relying upon knowledge and experience.
Opens chamber hatch to admit cold air and adjusts controls to change drying speed at particular drying stages to comply with laboratory recommendation or to meet changing atmospheric conditions.
Regulates temperature and humidity in pressroom to maintain required atmospheric conditions.
Evaluates quality of dried macaroni on basis of color.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
523.380-010 COCOA-BEAN ROASTER II (sugar 
Sets up and operates such equipment as continuous roaster, cracker and fanner, dryer, and grinder, to process cocoa beans to make chocolate liquor: Turns gas valves and electric switches to start and heat roaster.
Sets thermostat and rheostat to control temperature of roaster and speed of rotation.
Starts conveyor to transfer specified type and amount of beans from storage to roaster.
Examines sample of beans for color, tastes beans for flavor, and crumbles beans to determine moisture content.
Adjusts temperature and speed of roaster in accordance with findings.
Starts cracking and fanning machine to break and remove husks from roasted cocoa beans [CRACKING-AND-FANNING-MACHINE OPERATOR (sugar 
Observes nibs (cracked roasted cocoa beans) and shells to evaluate husking process, and adjusts machine accordingly.
Opens slide gate on fanner to convey nibs scheduled for dutch processing [DRIER OPERATOR (sugar 
Starts agitator to mix beans in treating tank for specified time.
Opens tank gate to release beans for conveying to dryer.
Starts gas-fired dryer, sets rheostat, and feels beans for dryness.
Starts conveyor to move dried beans to roaster for roasting or to grinding machine [LIQUOR-GRINDING-MILL OPERATOR (sugar 
Turns valve to pump chocolate liquor to storage tanks.
Patrols area to observe coordination of machine and equipment to ensure orderly flow of material at specified rates.
GOE: 06.01.03 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
523.382-010 GUNNER (grain-feed mills) alternate titles: cereal popper; shooter
Controls guns (pressure cylinders) to expand or puff whole grain to produce breakfast cereal: Presses button to admit grain and water to electric- or gas-heated cylinder.
Clamps lid in place and starts cylinder rotating.
Turns valves and moves controls to regulate air pressure and temperature in cylinder to obtain product having puffed kernels of specified size, color, and uniformity.
Removes lid after specified time, causing grain to expand as it escapes from cylinder.
Examines and feels product to determine need for adjustments in process conditions.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
523.382-014 MAPLE-SYRUP MAKER (food prep., nec)
Controls equipment to produce maple syrup: Transfers maple sap to evaporator pan placed on stove, allowing product to flow through various compartments of evaporator.
Pours additional sap into evaporator as needed to maintain uniform temperature.
Transfers syrup to heated finishing pan when level of product in evaporator indicates evaporation is complete.
Tests syrup for prescribed consistency by adding quantity of syrup to cold water and observing appearance.
Filters evaporated syrup through cloths or other filtration media.
Pours syrup into containers or molds for storage, use, or sale.
May boil, stir, and evaporate syrup to form variety of maple products, such as maple sugar, wax, butter, or candy, depending on processing temperature and time, and be designated Maple-Products Maker (food prep., nec).
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
523.382-018 MELTER OPERATOR (sugar 
Operates heating and mixing equipment (melters) that reclaims uncrystallized sugar from molasses and softens molasses adhering to sugar crystals: Starts pumps, turns valves to start flow of molasses, and starts conveyor that dumps sugar crystals into melting tanks.
Turns steam valves to maintain specified temperature, and starts agitators.
Observes dials on panelboard and adjusts controls to maintain specified temperature, steam pressure, and density of mixture.
Tests mixture for alkalinity, using pH meter, and posts data, such as test results, temperature, and density of mixture on report form.
May mix and store milk of lime solution.
May add milk of lime to mixture to obtain specified alkalinity.
May pump liquors to char house for filtration.
May clean pump screens, using hose and water.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
523.382-022 PROCESSOR, INSTANT POTATO (food prep., nec)
Controls equipment to process potatoes into instant potato granules: Reads laboratory reports to stay apprised of laboratory test results of potato samples taken during processing.
Observes lights, gauges, and meters on panelboard controls to determine temperature readings of equipment, such as precookers, precoolers, cookers, and driers.
Turns dials on panelboard to maintain operating temperature ranges as required to meet company standards.
Flips switches and presses buttons on panelboard to start potato processing equipment, such as feed screws, mixers, cookers, and granule driers.
Walks through processing areas and observes product consistency and product level in equipment, such as feed screws and cookers.
Turns equipment controls on panelboard to adjust temperatures of cookers or airflow through driers, utilizing knowledge of product processing.
Listens for alarms that indicate malfunctions of processing units and takes required steps, such as shutting down equipment and notifying supervisor.
Records shift activities in log.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 86
523.385-010 PRESSURE-TANK OPERATOR (chemical)
Tends steam pressure tanks to extract glue from bones: Opens valve to admit steam into tank of bones, and observing gauges, adjusts pressure according to specifications.
Shuts off steam and releases pressure after required period, and drains glue liquor into storage tank.
Measures density and temperature of liquor, and records hydrometer and thermometer readings on control sheet.
Weighs out specified amount of zinc sulfate preservative and adds it to glue in storage tank.
GOE: 06.04.19 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.562-010 DIFFUSER OPERATOR (sugar 
Operates automatic multicell diffuser to extract sugar juice from beet slices: Starts diffuser and auxiliary equipment, such as beet slicers, conveyors, and automatic weighing scales.
Observes dials and turns controls to regulate flow of beets and water into diffuser, speed of agitators, and temperature of liquid in cells.
Reads laboratory report to determine sugar content of beets, and adjusts controls to obtain maximum amount of sugar juice.
Examines diffuser cells to determine if screens are clear, and that liquid levels are maintained at specified height.
Reads control panel dials and automatic indicators, and records operating data, such as tonnage of beets sliced and diffused, and tonnage of water required to diffuse beet slices.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L3 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
523.585-010 BUTTER LIQUEFIER (oils 
Tends equipment that melts and pasteurizes butter for use in fortifying and flavoring margarine: Opens valves to admit steam to heat chambers of liquefier and pasteurizer to prescribed temperatures.
Places butter blocks on revolving table and starts liquefier to melt and deposit liquefied butter into receiving tank.
Pumps melted butter through pasteurizer and preset cooling unit into holding tank.
Weighs and adds prescribed ingredients to complete batch.
Dismantles piping, using handtools.
Flushes lines, and cleans tanks and equipment, using solvents and water.
Maintains operating log and temperature charts.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.585-014 CHILLER TENDER (meat products)
Tends immersion vats and cooling equipment that chill dressed chickens to prevent spoilage: Starts water pumps, agitators, ice feeders, and conveyors and turns valves to control rate of flow and temperature of water circulating through chilling vats.
Observes flow of ice through troughs that feed conveyor and dislodges caked ice with mallet.
Reads gauges and thermometers to verify temperatures in chilling vats and cooler.
Activates mechanical rakes to regulate flow of ice from storage bins to vats.
Records temperatures on report form.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.585-018 CRYSTALLIZER OPERATOR (sugar 
Tends crystallizers that agitate mixture of crystallized sugar and massecuite (molasses) while it cools to prevent solidification and to allow sugar crystals to grow: Opens valves on signal from SUGAR BOILER (sugar 
Starts agitators to prevent sugar crystals and massecuite from separating.
Turns valves to maintain level, temperature, and consistency of sugar mass in crystallizers.
Steams out empty crystallizers to remove and recover hard sugar adhering to agitators, tank sides, and piping.
Maintains records, such as equipment power and temperature readings and disposition of sugar strikes.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.585-022 DRIER, LONG GOODS (food prep., nec) alternate titles: long-goods drier
Tends battery of preset, final drying chambers that automatically dry macaroni long goods: Pushes rack of macaroni into drying chambers and starts drying cycle.
Observes hydrometer on chamber and removes rack of dried macaroni after completion of drying cycle.
Records date and time of drying process on tag and fastens tag to rack.
Pushes rack to storage area.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
523.585-026 PASTEURIZER (oils 
Tends equipment that pasteurizes, incubates, and blends sweet or sour milk for use in manufacture of margarine: Opens valve to pump prescribed amount of water into tank and adds preweighed powdered milk or opens valve to pump fresh milk or reconstituted powdered milk into tank.
Starts agitator.
Turns steam valve to heat batch to designated temperature for specified period of time.
Admits water into cooling system to reduce heat of batch to storage temperature.
Adds specified culture of mixture to produce batch of sour milk.
Pumps sweet and sour milk mixture into mixing tank preparatory to churning.
Records number of batches produced.
May clean and sterilize tank and auxiliary equipment, using steel wool, detergent, and caustic soda solution.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
523.585-030 PULP-DRIER FIRER (sugar 
Tends drum-type rotary driers and heating kilns, from central control station, to remove moisture from beet pulp and molasses mixture being processed into cattle fodder: Moves controls to admit fuel and air into kiln and ignite fire in kiln.
Adjusts controls to obtain specified temperature in drier drum.
Starts scrolls, elevators, and belt conveyors.
Observes panelboard gauges and automatic recorder readings and moves controls to regulate drier temperature and rotation speed of drier drum according to moisture content of pulp-molasses mixture.
Feels processed pulp to ensure that drying process meets specifications.
Takes readings from conveyor scale to ascertain tonnage of fodder produced.
Records production and operating data in station log.
Collects samples of cattle fodder produced for laboratory analysis.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.585-034 ROASTER, GRAIN (grain-feed mills)
Tends equipment that roasts whole or milled grain to specified color or hardness preparatory to processing into cereal: Lights gas jets under drum or pan and sets temperature regulator at specified setting.
Moves controls to transfer grain to drum or pan and start agitator that prevents sticking of grain to sides of vessel.
Shovels grain from outer edge of pan to center to ensure uniform agitation of batch.
Pushes grain from pan, using scoop, or pulls lever to dump grain onto conveyor after specified time, or determines removal time by matching color of roasted grain with color of standard sample.
Records temperature reading and roasting time of batch.
May start conveyor to move roasted grain to cooling pan and agitate grain with rake as blower forces air through perforated bottom of pan.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
523.587-010 DRIER, SHORT GOODS (food prep., nec)
Observes meters and gauges to ensure that drying process of macaroni short goods proceeds as scheduled: Patrols drying room and reads instruments and charts that control and record automatic drying process in preliminary, secondary, and final drying chambers.
Reports deviations from specified chart trackings.
Fills hydrometer wells with water.
Dumps specified quantities of vitamins into press hopper, and reads meter to ensure required vitamin feed rate.
Prepares report of drying operations and number of vitamin hoppers filled.
May relieve PRESS TENDER (food prep., nec).
GOE: 06.03.02 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.587-014 DRYING-ROOM ATTENDANT (tobacco)
Loads stripped or unstripped tobacco on racks in drying room and remoistens tobacco to increase pliability for use in making cigars: Places trays of tobacco on racks and removes them after specified time.
Sprays leaves with water, using hose, and stacks trays.
Places moistened leaves in containers for cigar making after specified time.
Weighs and records weight of tobacco processed.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
523.662-010 BONE-CHAR KILN OPERATOR (grain-feed mills) alternate titles: head kiln operator
Controls kilns to reclaim char (activated carbon) used in filtering corn syrups: Turns valve to admit gas to kilns.
Specifies to BONE-CHAR KILN TENDER (chemical) temperature to maintain in kiln.
Reads pyrometers to verify temperature.
Observes operation of char conveyors to prevent spillage.
Collects and replaces temperature-recording graphs.
Patches flues, plugs up retorts, and replaces broken or worn parts in kiln.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L3 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
523.665-010 SUGAR DRIER (grain-feed mills)
Tends steam-heated rotary drier that dehydrates sugar products: Starts drier revolving and adjusts gates on ducts to prevent overloading and incomplete drying.
Observes flow of materials through elevators and conveyors to prevent jamming or spillage.
Signals CRYSTALLIZER OPERATOR (grain-feed mills) and CENTRIFUGAL OPERATOR (grain-feed mills; sugar 
Dumps sugar dust from collector into melting tanks and adds water to reclaim sugar lost during process.
Cleans equipment with steam, hot water, and hose.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.666-010 COCOA-BEAN-ROASTER HELPER (sugar 
Assists COCOA-BEAN ROASTER (sugar 
I and COCOA-BEAN ROASTER (sugar 
Observes thermometers and clock and notifies supervisor of deviations from specific temperature or roasting cycle.
Starts conveyors to move cocoa bean shells from cracker and fanner to shell cleaning machines or to transfer cleaned nibs (cracked roasted cocoa beans) to treating drums.
Examines shells for presence of nibs and dumps shells into cracker and fanner machine to recover nibs.
May tend cleaning machine [COCOA-BEAN CLEANER (sugar 
May mix potassium solution used in processing cocoa beans to make dutch process chocolate.
Performs other duties as described under HELPER (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M2 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
523.682-010 CHOCOLATE TEMPERER (sugar 
Controls water-jacketed kettles or automatic equipment that tempers chocolate preparatory to molding or coating operations: Starts pumps to transfer specified quantity of chocolate from storage tanks or dumps block chocolate into tempering kettles.
Observes thermometer and turns valves to admit water or steam into jacket of kettle and to alternately heat and cool chocolate, according to temperature time chart specifications.
Starts agitators and scrapers to mix chocolate in tank.
Tests viscosity of chocolate with viscosimeter, and adds cocoa butter and lecithin as required.
Pumps chocolate from tempering kettle through water-cooled column when using automatic tempering equipment.
Sets thermometer dial to regulate temperature of chocolate to achieve specified temper.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
523.682-014 COFFEE ROASTER (food prep., nec)
Controls gas fired roasters to remove moisture from coffee beans: Weighs batch of coffee beans in scale-hopper, and opens chute to allow beans to flow into roasting oven.
Observes thermometer and adjusts controls to maintain required temperature.
Compares color of roasting beans in oven with standard to estimate roasting time.
Opens discharge gate to dump roasted beans into cooling tray.
Starts machine that blows air through beans to cool them.
Records amounts, types, and blends of coffee beans roasted.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
523.682-018 DEXTRINE MIXER (grain-feed mills)
Controls operation of steam-jacketed cooker that heats mixture of starch and acid to make dextrine paste: Opens gate on overhead chute or shovels starch into cooker.
Adds specified amount of acid to start starch conversion process.
Turns valves to admit steam into jacket of cooker.
Starts agitator to stir cooking starch.
Observes process to determine when conversion to dextrine is made and turns valve to transfer dextrine to storage tanks or drums.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
523.682-022 DRIER OPERATOR (can.
&
Controls vacuum-drying equipment to convert egg or milk liquids into powder of specified moisture content: Couples spray unit between pipeline and drier, using wrench.
Places charts in temperature and vacuum recorders.
Starts gas-fired drier, vacuum pump, and circulating fan, and adjusts dampers.
Turns controls and observes gauges to obtain specified temperature and vacuum pressure in dryer.
Starts pump and turns valves to spray liquid into heated vacuum chamber where milk droplets are dried into powder.
Tests dried powder conveyed out of drier, using meter.
Observes interior of chamber walls for burned scale which indicates excessive temperature.
Adjusts temperature of dryer and amount of liquid sprayed into dryer to obtain specified moisture content and eliminate scale which appears as sediment in powder.
Places container on scale under outlet of drying equipment to fill container with specified amount of powder.
May be designated according to product dried as Buttermilk-Drier Operator (dairy products); Yolk Spray Drier (can.
&
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L3 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
523.682-026 DRUM DRIER (grain-feed mills)
Operates steam-heated drum drier in vacuum tank to dry liquid cereal mixture to specified consistency: Adjusts temperature regulator of vacuum tank to specified setting.
Starts vacuum pump and revolving drum in vacuum tank.
Turns valve to raise level of liquid in pan beneath drum, causing thin film of liquid to dry as it contacts rotating drum.
Turns valve and moves controls to regulate drum temperature and speed and level of liquid in pan to attain specified color and consistency of dried cereal.
Installs scraping blade that peels dried cereal from drum into handtruck, using wrench.
Opens vacuum chamber and removes loaded handtruck.
Pushes truck onto scale, records weight, and trips lever to dump contents into hopper.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
523.682-030 KILN OPERATOR, MALT HOUSE (beverage)
Controls gas-fired furnace that heats malt drying kilns: Pushes ignition switch and turns gas valve to light furnace.
Observes temperature gauge or recording charts, and adjusts gas valves, dampers, and speeds of draft and exhaust fans to maintain specified temperature in kiln.
May move levers that tip floor sections of kiln to drop dried malt into storage hopper.
May open and control slide gate of storage hopper dispensing malt to cleaning machine.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
523.682-034 PERCOLATOR OPERATOR (grain-feed mills)
Operates percolating equipment to produce liquid mixture of water, grain, and other ingredients according to formula, as part of cereal-manufacturing process: Starts agitator and turns valves to draw premeasured amounts of milled grain, water, and other ingredients into percolating vessel.
Sets temperature regulator of vessel at specified setting.
Turns valve at bottom of tank to draw off liquid percolate into storage tanks.
Tests sample of percolate, using hydrometer, to determine concentration of liquid filter bed and turns valve to shut off percolate flowing to storage tanks when hydrometer indicates ingredients in filter bed are exhausted.
Pulls lever to dump spent grain mixture into handtruck.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
523.682-038 TOBACCO CURER (agriculture)
Controls heating equipment in tobacco barns to cure tobacco: Starts coal or wood fire in furnace, lights oil or gas burner, or turns on electric furnace to heat barn.
Regulates temperature and draft controls, depending on type of tobacco and weather conditions, until leaves are yellowed.
Observes color and moisture content of leaves to determine when to increase heat and regulate draft controls to dry leaves and stems.
When bulk curing barns (tobacco leaves packed in metal racks and cured by forced air heat) are used, starts and regulates fan speed to control movement of air and heat through tobacco leaves.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.685-010 BATCH FREEZER (dairy products)
Tends batch freezer that freezes liquid ice cream mix to semisolid consistency: Measures specified amounts of ice cream mix, color, and flavor, using graduate, and dumps ingredients into freezer barrel.
Starts beaters and refrigerating unit.
Observes clock and ammeter for specified reading denoting end of freezing cycle and turns valve to start flow of frozen mix into containers.
Places fixture which ripples ice cream into valve outlet, and stirs syrups into ice cream with spoon or adds candies, fruit, and nuts to make various varieties of ice cream.
Places containers of mix in hardening cabinet.
Washes and sterilizes equipment, using cleansing solution, brushes, and hot water.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
523.685-014 BLANCHING-MACHINE OPERATOR (can.
&
Tends machine that blanches fruits and vegetables preparatory to canning and preserving: Observes gauges, sets dials, and turns valves to fill machine with water and admit steam and to regulate temperature and blanching time.
Starts machine, and conveyor or pump to feed product to and from machine.
Feels and visually examines blanched product to determine adequacy of softening or color setting.
May fill and weigh containers of blanched product, using shovel and platform scale.
May feed paste products, such as spaghetti or noodles into machine by hand.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.685-018 CHILLING-HOOD OPERATOR (meat products)
Tends machine that chills cased chickens and chicken parts preparatory to storage in refrigerated holding rooms: Monitors thermometers and carbon dioxide gas pressure gauges, and turns regulating valve controls to adjust flow of gas refrigerant into cartons.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
523.685-022 CHOCOLATE TEMPERER (bakery products; grain-feed mills) alternate titles: chocolate maker; chocolate-mixer operator
Tends jacketed kettles to temper chocolate used for coating baked products: Breaks slabs of prepared chocolate into pieces and dumps pieces into kettle.
Turns valves to adjust kettle heat to specified temperature to melt chocolate.
Starts agitator.
Opens water valve to cool mixture to desired consistency.
Opens valve to drain mixture into container and dumps chocolate into enrobing machine tank.
May mix cocoa butter with melted chocolate for use as filling.
May process grain to form gluten and be designated Premix Operator, Concentrate (grain-feed mills).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.685-026 COFFEE ROASTER, CONTINUOUS PROCESS (food prep., nec)
Tends coffee roaster equipped with rotating cylinder through which green coffee beans flow in continuous stream for roasting.
Moves controls to regulate speed of cylinder rotation, rate of flow of beans, and temperature of oven for each coffee blend, according to specifications.
May tend machine that grinds coffee beans [COFFEE GRINDER (food prep., nec)].
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.685-030 COOK-BOX FILLER (meat products)
Tends steam-jacketed tank in which flesh is removed from bones of animals: Lowers basket of bones into water-filled cooking tank, using hoist.
Opens and regulates steam valves to heat water to specified temperature.
Removes basket of cleaned bones from tank with hoist.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
523.685-034 COOKER, MEAL (oils 
Tends steam cooker that breaks down oil cells and controls moisture content of corn, soybeans, cottonseed, linseed meal (meats) or fish, prior to extraction of oil: Turns valves to regulate steam pressure inside cooker or steam jacket and to maintain temperature within specified range.
Observes conveyor feeding material to cooker or climbs to top of cooker to determine that material is feeding continuously.
May scoop handful of material from entry or discharge point of cooker and examine or feel material to determine how much steam should be added.
May record steam pressure and temperature readings at specified intervals.
May tend machine to crush meats for processing.
May tend cake-forming machine to shape cottonseed meats for pressing [CAKE FORMER (oils 
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.685-038 COOLER TENDER (grain-feed mills)
Tends equipment that cools corn sugar syrup and transfers syrup to storage tanks: Observes thermometer and turns valves to regulate flow of cold water through cooling coils, and to start flow of syrup over coils.
Starts pump to transfer cooled syrup to storage tanks.
Draws samples to test for Baume (specific gravity), sulfur dioxide, acidity, and alkalinity.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
523.685-042 COOLING-MACHINE OPERATOR (beverage) alternate titles: cooler operator
Tends equipment that cools and transfers wort to starting tank preparatory to fermenting: Turns valves to control flow of refrigerant through cooler coils.
Starts pumps and opens valves to draw hot wort from tank through cooler and into starting tank.
Monitors pressure gauges, flowmeters, thermometers, and temperature recorders, and turns valves to control rate of flow and temperature of wort passing through cooling machine.
Observes flowmeter and opens valves to admit specified amounts of air into wort.
Opens valves to circulate solutions through wort coils to clean and sterilize lines.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
523.685-046 COOLING-PAN TENDER (can.
&
Tends equipment that cools preserves and fruit concentrate: Turns valve to admit water into jacket of cooling pan to cool preserves and fruit concentrate.
Skims foam from top of preserves, using ladle.
Stirs preserves or fruit concentrate with paddle to prevent coagulation and to allow even cooling.
Observes thickening and starts pump, or opens dump valve, to transfer preserves or fruit concentrate from cooling pan to holding tank or filling machine when desired consistency is reached.
May determine sugar content of preserves or fruit concentrate, using refractometer, and record results.
May add sugar or water to preserves or fruit concentrate, according to formula, to bring sugar content up to standard.
May start fan above cooling pan to aid cooling.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
523.685-050 CRYSTALLIZER OPERATOR (grain-feed mills)
Tends cooling tank and crystallizer that starts crystallization of liquid sugar: Turns valves and starts pumps to fill cooling tank with liquid sugar and regulate flow of cold water through cooling coils until specified temperature is attained.
Turns wing nut to release tension on outlet door of crystallizer and pushes lever to raise door.
Knocks out sugar plug to allow sugar to flow to centrifugals.
Measures depth of sugar in crystallizer to ensure that small amount of sugar remains to start crystallization of next batch.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.685-054 DEHYDRATOR TENDER (can.
&
Tends sulfur and drying chambers to bleach and dehydrate fruit: Starts conveyors to load trays with fruit, and levels fruit in trays to ensure thorough processing.
Pushes loaded cart into sulfurizing chamber and lights burner to generate fumes.
Moves cart from sulfurizing chamber into drying chamber to dehydrate fruit.
Observes gauges, and regulates and maintains specified temperature and humidity in drying chambers.
Feels and observes fruit during dehydrating process to ascertain firmness and color in accordance with standards.
Pulls cart from heating chamber.
May record drying time of each load.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.685-058 DRIER ATTENDANT (can.
&
Tends rotary driers that remove moisture from materials, such as corn germs, alfalfa, and shredded sweet potatoes: Turns valves to admit steam through lines or fuel to furnace to heat drier.
Observes gauges to verify drier temperature.
Turns valves to regulate steam pressure or starts blower of furnace to regulate temperature of drier.
Examines and feels discharged material or observes gauges to determine that moisture content of material conforms to standard.
Turns handwheel or valve to control rate of speed and amount of material conveyed into drier.
Starts blower to remove material from drier.
May direct workers engaged in shredding potatoes and sacking dried material.
May be designated according to material dried as Germ Drier (grain-feed mills); or method of heating drier as Fire Drier (grain-feed mills).
May tend attrition and hammer mills [MILL OPERATOR (grain-feed mills)] in addition to rotary drier to prepare stock feed from bran and gluten and be designated Feed-Drier Tender (grain-feed mills).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.685-062 DRIER OPERATOR (can.
&
Tends steam-heated drying machine that removes moisture from cooked potatoes preparatory to grinding into flour: Rakes uniform coating of cooked potato mash deposited from auger-type conveyor over heated revolving cylinder to remove moisture.
May tend drying equipment that recovers starch byproduct from gluten wash.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
523.685-066 DRIER TENDER (can.
&
Tends machines that dehydrate nuts: Starts heater and sets thermostat to control air temperature.
Starts blower system that forces warm air through nuts to dry them, improve storage qualities, and prepare them for further processing.
Starts conveyor to move nuts into machine for dehydration.
Tests dryness of nuts by feeling or by using moisture indicator.
Attaches sack to discharge end of machine to catch dried nuts, or starts conveyor system that transfers dried nuts to storage bin.
May sew sack, using needle and twine.
May be designated according to kind of nut dehydrated as Walnut-Dehydrator Operator (can.
&
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.685-070 DRIER TENDER (grain-feed mills)
Tends drying equipment to reduce moisture content of cooked grain to specified degree of dehydration for cereal products: Adjusts steam valves to regulate temperature and pressure of drier to specified levels.
Turns valve or adjusts gate on conveyor to regulate amount of cereal entering drier.
Turns handcrank to adjust speed of conveyor through drier.
Visually and tactually inspects dried grain and collects samples throughout drying process to determine moisture content of grain.
May turn valve and push button to start granulators and picker rolls that break lumps in cooked grain prior to or after drying.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.685-074 DRIER TENDER I (oils 
Tends rotary drier that removes moisture from fish scrap preparatory to grinding scrap into meal: Starts drier and conveyors that feed fish scrap into drier and move dried material to storage area.
Observes gauges and turns valves to regulate steam pressure and to keep temperature within prescribed range.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
523.685-078 FIRER, KILN (sugar 
Tends battery of char-kilns that revivify char used in filtration of liquor: Starts fires and regulates gas and air pressure in kilns and flow of water through heat exchanges to control temperature.
Observes inside of kiln through peep-hole to detect wall defects and char leakages.
Examines and adjusts equipment, such as char-draw mechanisms, emergency stop alarms, remote control switches, and water-sprays on char-conveyors.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.685-082 FREEZER TUNNEL OPERATOR (can.
&
Tends freeze tunnel to quick-freeze food products: Pushes switches to start and control speed of conveyorized screen that conveys food product through tunnel that flash freezes food as it passes.
Turns valves to adjust temperature in tunnel and monitors temperature and pressure gauges to ensure conformance to company specifications.
Patrols tunnel to observe progress of vegetables to ensure freezing and to detect machinery malfunctions.
Scrapes conveyor to remove excess ice or frost from conveyor and to break vegetables loose from conveyor to prevent accumulation, using hands and handtools.
Breaks excess ice from tunnel outlet to facilitate conveyorized frozen food off bearing.
Notifies supervisor of machinery malfunctions.
May tend machine that deposits breading onto food products [BREADING MACHINE TENDER (can.
&
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M1 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.685-086 GRAIN DRIER (beverage) alternate titles: spent-grain dryer
Tends steam or gas-fired drum to dry grain or yeast: Starts dryer, turns steam valve, or lights gas burner and observes thermometers and pressure gauges to heat dryer to operating temperatures.
Opens valve or starts screw conveyor and vacuum pump to convey wet grain through heated drum and into discharge hopper.
Observes feeder gauge and turns valve or moves rheostat lever to adjust flow of yeast or grain to capacity of dryer.
Feels dried grain or yeast to judge moisture content or measures with moisture meter.
Adjusts valves to vary heat of dryer and grain and yeast flow to change moisture content to specifications.
When drying grain, attaches cloth bag to discharge hopper.
Weighs filled bag and seams top of bag, using portable sewing machine.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
523.685-090 GRAIN-DRIER OPERATOR (grain-feed mills)
Tends grain-drying machines that reduce moisture content of grain: Reviews data concerning moisture content of grain to be dried.
Moves levers to regulate gate on feed hopper and flow of grain through drier.
Observes temperature recorders and turns valves to regulate flow of steam pressure or gas to heat driers to specified temperature.
May observe conveyors transferring grain from storage bin and control flow of grain into feed hopper.
May test grain to ensure moisture content standards are being met, using moisture meter or standard oil-distillation test.
May be designated according to grain dried as Rice-Drier Operator (grain-feed mills).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.685-094 GRAIN-WAFER-MACHINE OPERATOR (bakery products)
Tends machines that soak, form, and bake whole grains of wheat or rice into wafers: Dumps sacks of grain into soaking tank.
Turns valve to regulate flow of water into tank, and starts tank revolving.
Turns off water after specified soaking period and starts air blower to dry grain.
Pushes lever to empty tank, and starts screw conveyor that moves grain into feed hopper of baking machine.
Lights gas burners to heat crushing and baking rollers.
Starts machine that flattens and bakes grains into solid sheets.
Turns valve to adjust temperature of rollers depending on color and texture of extruded sheet of wafers.
Fills salting hopper, using hand scoop.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.685-098 GRANULATOR OPERATOR (sugar 
Tends rotary-type kiln that dries sugar to specified moisture content: Starts equipment, such as scrolls, and conveyors.
Turns valve to admit steam into heating coils, and starts fan that blows air around steam coils in drum.
Opens gate on feed scroll to admit sugar to drum.
Observes instruments to ascertain that temperatures and humidity in drums are within specified limits.
Adjusts gate or speed of feed scroll and amount of steam pressure in coils to control temperature, luster, and grist of sugar.
Keeps records of station operations.
Takes samples of sugar for laboratory analysis.
Clears blockages in scrolls and magnetic screens, using mallet or brush.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.685-102 ICE MAKER (food prep., nec)
Tends refrigerating equipment that freezes water into ice, performing any combination of following tasks: Opens valves to fill containers with specified amounts of water, and lowers containers into freezing tanks, using hoist.
Inserts air bubbler into containers and starts agitator in freezing tank to ensure uniform freezing.
Siphons or pumps water containing foreign matter from centers of partially frozen ice blocks, using suction pump, and refills container with fresh water.
Flushes surfaces of ice blocks with hose.
Removes container from tank, using hoist, and immerses it in warm water or places it in steam bath to free ice from container sides.
Positions cans on $T3dumping pivot$T1 and pushes buttons to tilt pivot and dump ice onto conveyor or platform.
Adds prescribed amounts of materials into mixing vats and starts agitator to mix brine solution for freezing tanks.
May turn valves to regulate compressors and condensers.
When performing specific duty, may be known as Can Filler (food prep., nec); Dumper (food prep., nec); Ice Puller (food prep., nec).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.685-106 INSTANTIZER OPERATOR (dairy products)
Tends hydrating and drying equipment to make instant dairy products, using either of following methods: (1) Turns valves, starts fans, and observes thermometers and gauges to heat drying chamber to specified temperature and supply steam to hydrating jets.
Starts conveyors and shaker screen.
Turns dial to transfer powder from feeder hopper through steam spray, drying chamber, and vibrating screen into storage hopper.
Turns steam valves and feeder dial to adjust temperature or powder flow to maintain specified moisture content.
(2) Starts pumps, turns valves, and observes meter to spray water into hydrator at specified rate.
Starts blower to push powder from storage hopper, through water spray, and onto conveyor leading to dryer and sizing rolls.
Turns valve and observes thermometer to maintain specified temperature in dryer.
Positions sizing rolls on conveyor, using wrench, to crumble dried powder to specified size.
Examines and feels powder for moisture and charring.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.685-110 PASTEURIZER (beverage; can.
&
Tends machine that pasteurizes bottled or canned food products or beverages: Starts water spray or steam in pasteurizer and starts conveyor that moves bottles or cans through machine.
Observes water or steam temperature gauge to ensure constancy of temperature or notifies quality control laboratory of deviations.
Pushes pasteurized bottles or cans from machine table onto conveyor by hand or with metal bar to prevent jamming.
Removes broken bottles from conveyor.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
523.685-114 STERILIZER OPERATOR (dairy products)
Tends conveyor line enclosed in series of circular chambers to cook canned milk to sterilize and change viscosity and color of milk: Turns steam, water, and hot air valves and observes gauges to adjust temperature of heating, cooking, cooling, and drying chambers.
Observes panel lights for machine failure and stops conveyor to remove jammed cans.
Observes filled sealed cans moving through chambers and removes dented cans or sample test cans.
Opens sample can and dips spoon into sterilized milk to observe grain (texture), viscosity, and color.
May alter cooking temperature or add measured amount of calcium or phosphate to milk batch to obtain specified grain and viscosity.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.685-118 TOBACCO-DRIER OPERATOR (tobacco) alternate titles: drying-oven tender
Tends driers that remove moisture from leaf and processed tobacco: Starts driers (rotating drums) and turns valves to admit steam to heat coils of driers or opens valves on gas burners and sets thermostat.
Periodically feels tobacco to determine dryness and regulates heat to dry tobacco within specified limits.
May record readings of humidigraphs and thermometers on chart.
May feed tobacco into drier.
May be designated according to types of tobacco dried as Snuff Drier (tobacco); Tobacco-Stem-Drier Operator (tobacco).
May tend driers that impart distinctive flavor (toast) to tobacco and be designated Toaster Operator (tobacco).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
523.685-122 VACUUM DRIER OPERATOR (can.
&
Tends vacuum drier system to dehydrate prebleached and preevaporated fruit in evaporating plant: Loads fruit-filled trays onto drier shelves and closes and seals doors.
Turns switches and dials to start heater and set temperature and timing for preheating system's circulating water.
Turns switches and dials in prescribed sequence to activate timer, water pumps, and condenser and to put system on automatic cycle.
Turns hand-valve to break vacuum at end of cycle, sets timer, and allows fruit to cool.
Removes filled trays from drier and turns and pulls trays across bin-mounted scraper to remove dehydrated fruit.
Listens for sounds that indicate malfunctions, and notifies supervisor of malfunctions that fail to respond to specified corrective actions.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R3 M1 L2 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
523.685-126 WINE PASTEURIZER (beverage)
Tends tanks used to pasteurize fermented wine: Meters out specified quantities of wine into tanks and turns steam valves to admit heat.
Observes thermometer readings and gauges of tanks to ensure heating of wine at required temperature for specified time to effect pasteurization.
Starts pumps to transfer wine from pasteurizing tanks to storage tanks.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
523.687-010 COFFEE-ROASTER HELPER (food prep., nec)
Assists COFFEE ROASTER (food prep., nec) to roast green coffee beans: Picks over green coffee, discarding black and dead coffee beans, to prepare coffee for roasting.
May weigh and pack ground coffee.
Performs other duties as described under HELPER (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
523.687-014 FISH DRIER (can.
&
Dries fish, such as salmon, cod, herring, or sardines: Hangs fish on racks or poles, or places them in trays.
Sets racks, poles, or trays in drying room or oven.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
523.687-018 KILN LOADER (beverage)
Spreads germinated barley or green hops on kiln floor to dry: Holds and directs swing chute to discharge and spread barley or hops evenly over floor.
Levels barley or hops, using fork.
Loosens lock bolts to tip holding-kiln floor screens and drop barley or hops onto next drying floor or into storage hopper or pushes product into lower bin, using scraper.
May clean and scrub malthouse floors.
GOE: 06.04.40 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
523.687-022 FREEZING-ROOM WORKER (can.
&
Moves racks of food packages into and out of freezing room: Wheels portable racks filled with food packages and fresh meat into freezing room for freezing.
Records identifying data, such as brand name, package sizes, and time of entry in freezing room.
Feels packages after specified time to test solidity of freeze.
Notifies supervisor when specified quotas are filled, and when temperature fluctuates, or outside air leaks into freezing compartments.
Pulls racks from freezing room with power winch when wheels are frozen.
GOE: 06.04.40 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 78
524 COATING, ICING, DECORATING, AND RELATED OCCUPATIONS
This group includes occupations concerned with applying coverings, fillings, sprays, and decoration to products or components to complete assembly, affect flavor and appearance, improve baking and keeping qualities, and serve as identification.
524.381-010 CAKE DECORATOR (bakery products) alternate titles: pastry decorator
Decorates cakes and pastries with designs, using icing bag or handmade paper cone: Trims uneven surfaces of cake or cuts and shapes cake to required size, using knife.
Spreads icing between layers and on surfaces of cake, using spatula.
Tints white icing with food coloring.
Inserts die of specific design into tip of bag or paper cone and fills bag or cone with colored icing.
Squeezes bag to eject icing while moving bag with free-arm writing motions to form design on cake.
Forms decorations on $T3flower nail$T1 and transfers decorations to cake, using spatula.
May mix icing.
GOE: 05.05.17 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
524.381-014 DECORATOR (dairy products)
Molds and decorates ice cream confections according to order: Packs ice cream into metal molds shaped as flowers, fruit, animals, cake, or pie, using spoon, knife, or spatula.
Presses mold halves together and places mold in hardening cabinet.
Immerses hardened molds in water, pries molds open and removes confection, using knife.
Whips cream, sugar, and dye by hand or in machine beater to make whipped cream of specified color and consistency.
Folds parchment paper into cone shape, places metal extrusion tip into bottom of cone and fills cone with whipped cream.
Presses tube and moves tube over confection to create designs and figures, such as leaves, flowers, wreaths, or letters to decorate confection as indicated on order.
Holds confection under stencil in tray and covers confection with whipped cream, using spatula, or with dye to form wording, using spray gun.
May place paper, plastic or metal decorations on confection.
GOE: 01.06.03 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
524.382-010 COATING-MACHINE OPERATOR (sugar 
Operates machine to coat items, such as candy, nuts, and chewing gum tablets, with syrup, wax coloring matter, or other material to provide specified finish or polish: Dumps product into pan and starts pan revolving.
Pours specified quantity of syrup over whirling candy or other product, and passes hands through batch to spread syrup uniformly.
Turns steam valve and observes thermometer to regulate pan temperature, according to changes in atmospheric conditions, or when hard coatings have been specified.
Examines and feels product to determine adequacy of coating, and applies successive charges of syrup until specified coating thickness is attained.
Adds flavoring and coloring ingredients in final coating, as specified.
May mix together and apply emulsified or dry ingredients, such as gum solution, cornstarch, and powdered sugar to product.
May transfer contents to polishing pans and add specified ingredients to polish coating.
May set temperature controls and start blower to dry syrup.
May be designated according to product coated or polished as Almond-Pan Finisher (sugar 
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
524.382-014 ENROBING-MACHINE OPERATOR (bakery products; sugar 
Controls machines and equipment to enrobe (coat) confectionery or bakery products with melted chocolate or other coating and to cool enrobed products preparatory to packing: Turns switches and valves on central control panel and pushes levers to start machine and conveyor that transfer candy or other products over prebottoming device to coat bases, under flow pan to receive coating, past air nozzle to blow off surplus coating, over trimming device to wipe drippings from enrobed pieces, and through cooling tunnel to packing area.
Weighs coated products at random to ensure specified thickness of coating and examines products for conformity to solidification, gloss, and uniformity of coating.
Adjusts air blower, trimming rod, and flow of coating to correct product deviations.
Turns switches and valves to adjust steam and water flow in jacketed supply tank, belt speed, and temperature of cooling tunnel in accordance with findings.
May adjust automatic decorating device on machines so equipped to produce hand-dipped effect on coated product.
May be designated according to coating material as Chocolate-Machine Operator (bakery products; sugar 
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M1 L2 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
524.565-010 TROLLEY OPERATOR (bakery products)
Tends trolley conveyors that convey icing-dipped cookies to cool and solidify them preparatory to packaging: Transports cookies and bowls of icing to other workers in trolley room, using handtruck.
Weighs icing on scales, records weights, and dumps contents of bowl into reservoirs.
Starts trolley conveyors and turns knob on rheostat to regulate its speed.
Turns valve in steam line or starts ventilating fans to adjust temperature of trolley room.
GOE: 06.04.40 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
524.665-010 SANDING-MACHINE OPERATOR (sugar 
Tends equipment that applies coating of sugar to candy, such as gumdrops and orange slices: Dumps sanding sugar into hopper of rotating cylinder.
Turns steam valve and starts conveyor that carries candy through steam bath for heating and moistening, and into cylinder for application of sugar coating.
Examines sugared candy as it emerges on conveyor and adjusts flow of steam and sugar to correct imperfections in coating.
Notifies other workers to remove malformed or improperly coated candies.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
524.682-010 DEPOSITING-MACHINE OPERATOR (bakery products) alternate titles: filling-machine operator; marshmallow-machine worker; spreading-machine operator
Operates machine to deposit filling, such as icing, marshmallow, or peanut butter on cookies or crackers: Installs specified nozzles in machine, using wrench.
Starts pump to load machine hopper with filling.
Starts conveyor to position cookies under nozzles.
Turns valve to deposit specified amount of filling on cookies.
Pulls lever to feed product under refrigerated roller to spread filling over cookies.
Wipes filling from roller, using wet cloth.
Verifies weight of cookies on scale.
May place pans or sheets of cookies under nozzles.
May mix ingredients for filling.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M1 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
524.684-010 CANDY DIPPER, HAND (sugar 
Dips candy centers, fruit, or nuts into coatings to coat, decorate, and identify product: Scoops liquid coating material onto slab of heated dipping table and kneads material, such as chocolate, fondant, or icing to attain specified consistency.
Drops candy into mass and swirls candy about until thoroughly coated, using fingers or fork.
Removes candy and marks identifying design or symbol on top, using fingers or fork, to identify type of center or brand.
May decorate top of candy with nuts, coconut, or other garnishment.
May mix coating ingredients and dip candy into vat containing coating material, regulating vat temperature to maintain specified consistency.
May pour liquid chocolate into molds to form figures [CANDY MOLDER, HAND (sugar 
May be designated according to type of center dipped as Bonbon Dipper (sugar 
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
524.684-014 DECORATOR (bakery products; sugar 
Decorates confectionery products with chocolate, colored icings, or pastry cream: Screws nozzle of specified size and shape into outlet of decorating bag.
Fills bag with icing, chocolate, or pastry cream.
Squeezes bag to force material through nozzle, forming decorations, such as lines, letters, figures, or flowers.
May mix, cook, and color decorating material.
May spread material with brush, fingers, pronged instrument, or spatula.
May fill molds with icing to form decorations, such as bells, birds, and bootees.
May be designated according to product decorated as Candy Decorator (sugar 
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
524.684-018 ENROBING-MACHINE CORDER (sugar 
Marks top surface of coated candies with identifying or decorative stroke to simulate hand-dipped appearance: Dips fingers in semiliquid chocolate or other coating and marks candies with diagonal line, bead, or other design as candies emerge from enrobing (coating) machine on conveyor.
May mark tops of candies with symbol to identify type of center or flavor of candy.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
524.684-022 ICER, HAND (bakery products) alternate titles: decorator; finisher; froster; icing spreader
Covers baked goods with icing, frosting, or glaze by hand: Spreads icing evenly over surface of solid baked goods, using spatula.
Builds up layer cakes by spreading icing or filling between layers and then icing outer surface.
Applies glaze or thin icings to sweet rolls, fruit cake, speciality breads, and other items, using brush.
May sprinkle chocolate chips, shredded coconut, chopped nuts, or other decorative materials over baked goods.
May mix icings.
May pack iced products in cartons.
May be designated according to product iced as Bread Icer (bakery products); Cake Icer (bakery products); Doughnut Icer (bakery products); Pie Icer (bakery products); Roll Icer (bakery products).
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
524.685-010 BREADING MACHINE TENDER (can.
&
Tends machine that covers food products with breading material: Opens bag and dumps breading material into breading machine hopper.
Turns valve to regulate flow of breading material onto food products on conveyor passing beneath hopper.
Observes machine to detect malfunction.
Cleans machine and conveyor with water.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
524.685-014 CHEESE SPRAYER (sugar 
Tends equipment that coats popcorn or similar food product with melted cheese: Dumps salt into hopper of salt-sprinkling device.
Measures out specified quantity of cheese and coconut oil into thermostatically controlled melting and mixing kettle.
Starts conveyor to admit popcorn to rotating drum.
Starts drum rotating and pump that forces melted cheese through spray nozzle onto popcorn.
Places container at discharge end of drum to receive coated popcorn.
Transfers filled containers to packing room, using handtruck.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
524.685-018 COATING OPERATOR (grain-feed mills)
Tends coating and drying equipment that coats cereal products, such as flakes or puffed grain, with syrup, vitamin mixture, or other liquid: Lights gas burners or turns steam valve to attain specified temperature in drier and syrup storage tank.
Starts revolving drum and conveyors that feed cereal product into drum and through drier.
Pumps liquid from storage tank to perforated spraying pipe in drum.
Adjusts speed of conveyor and drum to coat cereal to specified thickness, indicated by feel and color inspection.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
524.685-022 CRACKER SPRAYER (bakery products)
Tends machine that sprays crackers with oil to impart color and prevent drying out: Pours oil into reservoir, using pail.
Adjusts steam valve to heat oil to specified temperature.
Starts machine and turns valves to regulate spray of oil on crackers.
Feeds crackers onto conveyor.
Weighs sampling of crackers to measure amount of oil being applied.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
524.685-026 ENROBING-MACHINE OPERATOR (bakery products) alternate titles: chocolate-coating-machine operator; enrober
Tends equipment that melts and sprays chocolate on cookies or crackers to enrobe (cover) them: Fills machine hopper with chocolate, using buckets or conveyor.
Turns valve to regulate temperature of tank to melt and facilitate flow of chocolate, according to thermometer reading.
Starts machine to spray chocolate on cookies or crackers.
Observes cookies emerging from machine to ensure adequate coating.
May melt and temper chocolate [CHOCOLATE TEMPERER (bakery products; grain-feed mills)].
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
524.685-030 FILLING MACHINE TENDER (bakery products)
Tends machine that automatically injects cream filling into snack-size cakes: Starts pump to fill machine hopper with filling.
Presses button to activate conveyor that conveys cakes under nozzles that automatically inject filling into cakes.
Observes cakes being filled to ascertain that cream is injected into center of cakes in prescribed portions.
Observes action of automatic dumping device at end of conveyor to ensure that all cakes in pan are dumped onto another conveyor which routes them for packaging.
Cleans residual filling from machine hopper and nozzles.
May turn hand valves to regulate pressurized flow and quantities of cream filling injected into cakes.
May collect and weigh measured amounts of aerated filling to ensure conformance with gravity specifications.
May remove, discard, and keep tally of unacceptable cakes.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
524.685-034 ICER, MACHINE (bakery products) alternate titles: finisher, machine; froster, machine; icing-machine operator
Tends machine that coats baked products with premixed icing: Loads machine hopper with icing, using scoop.
Starts machine and places products to be iced on conveyor.
Turns valve on hopper to regulate flow of icing.
May be designated according to product iced as Bread Icer, Machine (bakery products); Cake Icer, Machine (bakery products); Doughnut Icer, Machine (bakery products); Pie Icer, Machine (bakery products); Roll Icer, Machine (bakery products).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
524.685-038 MEXICAN-FOOD-MACHINE TENDER (food prep., nec)
Tends machine that automatically dispenses cheese onto tortillas to form enchiladas or ground meat onto taco shells to form tacos: Fills vat with meat or cheese mixture and turns control knobs to regulate flow of filling through dispenser mechanism.
Presses button to convey tortillas or taco shells under dispenser mechanism.
Periodically weighs sample product, using scale, and turns knob to adjust dispenser flow to maintain specified weight of product.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
524.686-010 ENROBING-MACHINE FEEDER (sugar 
Arranges candy centers on conveyor leading to enrobing (coating) machine according to specified feeding sequence: Selects assorted centers from boxes or trays and places them in rows on conveyor belt to conform to individual box or layer arrangement.
Removes malformed or broken centers and places them in salvage box.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
524.686-014 NOVELTY WORKER (dairy products) alternate titles: cone chocolate dipper; cone racker; sticker
Performs any combination of following tasks to make ice cream novelties, such as pies, cake rolls, cones, and vari-colored packs: Ladles fruit sauce over ice cream pie.
Places layer of cake roll on tray and sets tray on conveyor.
Cuts continuous ribbon of ice cream deposited on cake, using knife.
Rolls up cake.
Places roll in slicing machine and pulls lever to cut and eject slices onto packing table.
Rotates transparent containers under nozzle that fills containers with vari-colored ice cream.
Places cones, cups, pie plates, and other containers into dispenser of automatic filling machines.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
524.687-010 CHERRY CUTTER (can.
&
Cuts candied cherries into halves for use in decorating cakes, using sharp hand knife.
May assist in the packing department as directed.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
524.687-014 GARNISHER (sugar 
Garnishes candy and fills dried or pitted fruit, such as prunes, dates, peaches, and figs, with nuts to make confections: Places nuts on top or presses them into candy or fruit items.
Rolls candy in chopped or ground nut meats to coat product.
May be designated according to task performed as Fruit Stuffer (sugar 
II.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
524.687-018 RACKER (bakery products)
Loads wire racks with cookies, crackers, and wafers preparatory to their being dipped in icing: Removes wire rack from overhead trolley conveyor and places products on rack.
Lifts and hooks rack to conveyor.
May impale products on pins of wire rack and be designated Sticker (bakery products).
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
524.687-022 BAKERY WORKER, CONVEYOR LINE (bakery products)
Performs any combination of following tasks in preparation of cakes along conveyor line: Reads production schedule or receives instructions regarding bakery products that require filling and icing.
Inspects cakes moving along conveyor to detect defects and removes defective cakes from conveyor to reject bins.
Positions cakes on conveyor for application of filling or icing by machine, observes filling or icing application to ensure uniform coverage, and places additional cake layers on coated layers, depending on number of cake layers in product.
Observes cakes moving under automatic topping shaker and cake cutting machine to ensure uniform topping application and cutting.
Smooths iced edges of cake, using spatula, and moves decorating tool over top of designated cakes to apply specified appearance.
Notifies supervisor of malfunctions.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 86
525 SLAUGHTERING, BREAKING, CURING, AND RELATED OCCUPATIONS
This group includes occupations concerned with killing animals for use as food or byproducts, cutting up carcasses, and preserving and flavoring food, and related products by salting or smoking them.
525.131-010 SUPERVISOR, ABATTOIR (meat products)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in slaughtering, skinning, and dressing cattle, hogs, and sheep on killing floor of abattoir: Directs and trains workers in use of knife, air-knife, saws, and other handtools.
Inspects meat for specified color and texture to verify conformity to government regulations.
Sets control timer to regulate conveyors according to production schedules.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L2 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
525.131-014 SUPERVISOR, CUTTING AND BONING (meat products)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in cutting cattle, sheep or swine carcasses into standard cuts, removing bones and trimming excess fat from cuts, and preparing special cuts for marketing: Instructs new employees in cutting carcasses and preparing special cuts.
Examines cuts of meat to determine if quality standards are met.
Directs COOLER ROOM WORKER (meat products) in selection of carcasses to be processed.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L2 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
525.132-010 SUPERVISOR, CURED MEATS (meat products)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in curing and smoking meats, such as bacon and hams, following formulas for pickling meats and specifications for operating smokeroom equipment: Trains workers in operation of equipment.
Mixes dry and liquid pickling mixtures [PICKLING SOLUTION MAKER (meat products)].
Controls smokeroom equipment to smoke meat [SMOKER (meat products)].
Observes dial indicators and recording instruments to verify specified operating conditions of smokerooms and to detect machine and equipment malfunctions.
Observes color and appearance of meats and feels meats to verify quality.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L2 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
525.132-014 SUPERVISOR, TANK HOUSE (meat products)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in processing slaughtering-and-meat-packing byproducts, such as tallow, hides, and cracklings (residual solids from extracting tallow from bone, trimmings, and viscera): Trains new employees in operation of equipment.
Observes meters and dials to verify specified pressures and temperatures at various process stages.
Moves controls to regulate equipment and correct equipment malfunctions.
May supervise trimming and packing of offal products, such as tongues, livers, and tails.
May assist in purchase of hides and sales of offal products.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L2 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
525.134-010 SUPERVISOR, FISH PROCESSING (can.
&
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in cleaning, eviscerating and preparing fish for packing or canning: Trains workers to clean, eviscerate or prepare fish for packing or canning.
Inspects fish at various stages of processing to determine if company standards are being met.
Performs other duties as prescribed under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.04.01 STRENGTH: M GED: R4 M2 L2 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
525.134-014 SUPERVISOR, POULTRY PROCESSING (meat products)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in slaughtering, dressing, and packing poultry: Trains new workers in slaughtering, dressing, and packing duties.
Observes and evaluates performance of workers to ensure conformance to processing standards.
May substitute for line workers in emergencies.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.04.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L2 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
525.361-010 SLAUGHTERER, RELIGIOUS RITUAL (meat products)
Slaughters cattle, calves, and sheep as prescribed by religious law, and examines parts of carcasses to determine whether carcasses meet standards established by specific religion: Sharpens knife on whetstone or sharpening steel and washes knife.
Cuts throat of animal, using single stroke.
Inspects carcass and internal organs to verify absence of diseases.
May inspect and bid for animals at auction.
May offer ritual prayers while slaughtering animal.
May inflate lungs with air to determine whether lungs are punctured.
May mark carcasses of animals that meet religious standards.
May butcher meat for marketing.
May be required to hold license issued by religious organization.
May be designated according to specific religious group as Islamic Butcher (meat products); Shactor (meat products); Halal Butcher (meat products); Kosher Cutter And Searcher (meat products); Shochet (meat products).
GOE: 06.03.01 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 5 DLU: 86
525.381-010 BUTCHER APPRENTICE (meat products) alternate titles: slaughter-and-butcher apprentice
Performs duties as described under APPRENTICE (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.28 STRENGTH: H GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
525.381-014 BUTCHER, ALL-ROUND (meat products)
Performs slaughtering and butchering tasks in small slaughtering and meat packing establishment, using cutting tools, such as cleaver, knife, and saw: Stuns animals prior to slaughtering [STUNNER, ANIMAL (meat products)].
Shackles hind legs of animals, such as cattle, sheep, and hogs, to raise them for slaughtering or skinning [SHACKLER (meat products)].
Severs jugular vein to drain blood and facilitate slaughtering [STICKER, ANIMAL (meat products)].
Trims head meat and otherwise severs or removes parts of animal heads or skulls [HEAD TRIMMER (meat products)].
Saws, splits, or scribes slaughtered animals to reduce carcass [CARCASS SPLITTER (meat products)].
Slits open, eviscerates, and trims carcasses of slaughtered animals.
Cuts, trims, skins, sorts, and washes viscera of slaughtered animals to separate edible portions from offal [OFFAL SEPARATOR (meat products)].
Washes carcasses [WASHER, CARCASS (meat products)].
Wraps muslin cloth about dressed animal carcasses or sides to enhance appearance and protect meat [SHROUDER (meat products)].
Shaves hog carcasses [SHAVER (meat products)].
Trims and cleans animal hides, using knife [HIDE TRIMMER (meat products; oils 
Cuts bones from standard cuts of meat, such as chucks, hams, loins, plates, rounds, and shanks, to prepare meat for marketing [BONER, MEAT (meat products)].
Examines, weighs, and sorts fresh pork cuts [GRADER, GREEN MEAT (meat products)].
Skins sections of animals or whole animals, such as cattle, sheep, and hogs [SKINNER (meat products)].
Works in small slaughtering and meat packing establishment.
May prepare meats for smoking [SMOKED MEAT PREPARER (meat products)].
May cut and wrap meat.
May salt (cure) and trim hides [HIDE HANDLER (meat products; oils 
GOE: 06.02.28 STRENGTH: H GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
525.387-010 GRADER, MEAT (meat products)
Examines animal carcasses to determine grade in terms of sales value: Examines carcasses suspended from stationary hooks or hooks attached to overhead conveyor to determine grade based on age, sex, shape, thickness of meat, quantity and distribution of fat, color, texture, and marbling of lean meat.
Attaches grade identification tag to carcass.
May estimate weight of carcass or observe dial of automatic weighing scale to determine weight of carcass.
May be designated according to carcass graded as Beef Grader (meat products); Hog Grader (meat products); Sheep Or Calf Grader (meat products).
GOE: 06.03.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L1 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
525.587-010 SHROUDER (meat products) alternate titles: bagger
Covers dressed animal carcasses with muslin to protect meat during storage or shipment: Trims ragged edges of flesh from carcass, using knife.
Soaks muslin in brine solution and drapes wet muslin around suspended carcass.
Pins muslin to carcass, using skewers.
Slides carcass along conveyor and onto scale, and records weight.
Pushes carcass to conveyor leading to storage or shipping areas.
May wash carcass, using water hose.
GOE: 06.04.38 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.587-014 SMOKED MEAT PREPARER (meat products)
Prepares meats for smoking, performing any combination of following tasks: Soaks meat in water or brine and washes and scrapes encrusted salt, slime, grease, excess moisture, and discoloration from meat.
Weighs meat and stamps or presses inspection labels, weight, or symbols on meat by hand or using branding iron.
Ties cord through small end of hams and shoulders to form hanging loop.
Encases meat in stockinets (cloth bags) to preserve shape of meat during smoking.
Places metal hanging devices on racks, and hangs slabs of bacon on hooks of devices.
Hangs meat products on tree racks suspended from conveyor and starts conveyor to move products to smokeroom.
May strip stockinets from meat.
May trim and bone hams.
May be known according to task performed as Bagger, Meat (meat products); Comber (meat products); Hanger, Meat (meat products); Scraper, Meat (meat products); Soaker, Meat (meat products); Tier, Meat (meat products); Tree Loader, Meat (meat products); Washer, Meat (meat products).
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.664-010 MEAT DRESSER (agriculture) alternate titles: farm butcher
Butchers livestock, such as hogs, sheep, and cattle, in private slaughter house or on customer's premises: Kills animals, using rifle and sticker knife.
Raises carcass from floor, using hoist.
Skins animal with skinning knife and cleans carcass with brush and water.
Cuts carcass for packing, smoking, freezing, and salting, according to knowledge of meat cutting and customer's specifications, using saw, knives, and cleaver.
May wrap meat.
May grind meat into sausage.
GOE: 03.04.05 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
525.682-010 SMOKER (meat products) alternate titles: meat smoker; smokehouse attendant
Controls battery of smoke chambers in which meats, such as bacon, hams, meat loaf, sausage, shoulders, and wieners are cooked and cured: Loads racks and cages, suspended from overhead conveyor, with meat products and filled molds, and pushes racks into smokehouse for cooking and curing.
Shovels sawdust into hopper of smoker and lights burner to ignite sawdust.
Starts electric blower to admit air and blow smoke into curing chambers.
Observes gauges, turns steam valves, and adjusts ventilators and dampers to regulate temperature, humidity, and density of smoke to control cooking and curing process.
Inspects meat for color, feels meat for firmness, and inserts thermometer into meat to ascertain progress of cooking and curing.
Opens water valve to spray and chill meat.
Removes cooked and cured meat and empties molds.
Places meat loaves on racks and returns them to smokehouse for further smoking and drying.
Pushes racks of cured meat to chill room.
May stuff meat loaves into plastic casings, using horn (funnel-shaped tube).
May record weight and amount of meat cured.
May steam-clean smoke chambers and heating coils, and remove ash.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R3 M2 L1 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
525.684-010 BONER, MEAT (meat products) alternate titles: ribber
Cuts bones from standard cuts of meat, such as chucks, hams, loins, plates, rounds, and shanks to prepare meat for packing and marketing, using knife and meat hook: Inserts knife in meat around bones to separate meat, fat, or tissue.
Pulls and twists bones loose from meat.
Cuts and trims such meat cuts as butts, hams, flanks, and shoulders to shape meat and remove fat and defects.
Trims meat from bones and ribs.
May pull bones and skin from cooked pigs feet, and cut out toe bones and nails.
May be designated according to cut of meat boned as Blade Boner (meat products); Chuck Boner (meat products); Ham Boner (meat products); or type of animal boned as Beef Boner (meat products); Hog Ribber (meat products); Sheep Boner (meat products).
May be designated: Loin Boner (meat products); Plate Boner (meat products); Rib Boner (meat products); Round Boner (meat products); Shank Boner (meat products); Shoulder Boner (meat products).
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
525.684-014 BUTCHER, FISH (can.
&
Butchers eviscerated frozen, fresh, and salted fish for marketing or further processing: Dumps containers of fish into fresh water tank for cleaning.
Places cleaned fish on table or bench.
Trims off fins and tails, removes skin, and cuts fish into pieces of specified size, using knife or bandsaw.
Sorts pieces according to color and texture.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.684-018 CARCASS SPLITTER (meat products)
Performs any combination of following tasks involved in dismembering and cutting up hog, veal, beef, and other animal carcasses to facilitate handling preparatory to marketing or further processing, using knife, cleavers, hand and power saws, and other cutting tools: Saws or cuts through pelvic area of animal, and splits belly to expose and remove viscera.
Splits suspended carcass in half lengthwise along backbone of beef sides, and smooths and shapes beef with paddle.
Saws ribs along interior of hog carcasses to facilitate removal of loins and ribs.
Cuts, cleaves, or saws carcass sections to sever forequarters, hindquarters, shoulders, rumps, legs, and other parts.
Saws trimmed bones, such as skulls, ribs, and legs, into pieces preparatory to processing into byproducts.
May be known according to type or part of animal cut as Aitchbone Breaker (meat products); Beef Ribber (meat products); Bone Sawyer (meat products); Breast Sawyer (meat products); Ham Sawyer (meat products); Hog Sawyer (meat products).
May be designated: Rump Sawyer (meat products); Shoulder Sawyer (meat products); Side Splitter (meat products).
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M2 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
525.684-022 CRAB BUTCHER (can.
&
Butchers live crabs preparatory to canning: Grips crab with both hands and impales it on stationary spike.
Twists, pulls, and detaches crab body from back, leaving back on knife.
Wipes off gills and viscera and tosses crab body in vat of water.
Pulls crab back from knife and discards it.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.684-026 FINAL-DRESSING CUTTER (meat products)
Cuts out defective portions of dressed animal carcasses, following established procedures: Trims or skins carcass to remove residual blood, fat, hair, ragged edges, and overscalded skin, using knife.
Cuts condemned parts, such as broken bones and bruised flesh, from carcass under direction of government inspector, using knife, cleaver and saw.
May cut up condemned animals for rendering.
May be designated according to work area as Final-Rail Cutter (meat products); Retaining-Room Cutter (meat products).
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M1 L1 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
525.684-030 FISH CLEANER (can.
&
Cleans fish aboard ship or ashore, performing any combination of following tasks, alone or as member of crew: Scrapes scales from fish with knife.
Cuts or rips fish from vent to throat with knife, and tears out viscera and gills.
Cuts off head of fish with knife, drops head in tub, and slides fish along table to next worker.
Washes blood from abdominal cavity by dropping fish in tub of water or by use of hose, and removes discolored membrane from abdomen lining with knife, spoon, scraper, glove, or piece of burlap.
Cuts gashes along sides of fish to facilitate salt penetration during curing.
Cuts fish behind gill slits, draws knife along backbone and ribs to free fillet (boneless portion of flesh), lays fillet skinside down on table, and draws knife laterally between skin and flesh to remove skin.
Slices flesh from bones in fletches (longitudinal quarter sections) for further processing into boneless slices of fish.
Unloads catch from fishing vessels [LABORER, WHARF (can.
&
922.687-062].
May pack fish in containers.
May remove slime from fish preparatory to canning and be designated Slimer (can.
&
May clean, dress, wrap, label, and store fish for guests at resort establishments and be designated Fish Housekeeper (hotel 
May fillet fish and be designated Fish Filleter (can.
&
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 78
525.684-034 HEAD TRIMMER (meat products) alternate titles: head boner; templer, head
Trims meat, glands, and organs from carcass heads for use in making meat products or processing for medicinal use or byproducts, performing any combination of following tasks: Places head on table or in holding hooks and trims skin and meat from jaw, jowls, and skull with knife.
Cuts fat from lean meat and drops it into containers.
Inserts knife into mouth cavity to cut and remove tongue.
Trims fat, ragged edges, veins, and bruises from tongue.
Cuts and pulls hog snout from head, using knife and snout-pulling machine.
Pulls jaw from skull, using jaw pulling machine, bar, or chisel.
Places skull on block and splits it with automatic splitter or cleaver.
Removes brains, pituitary gland, and other parts, and places them in separate trays.
Removes horns from head, using shears.
May be known according to duty performed as Brain Picker (meat products); Chiseler, Head (meat products); Jawbone Breaker (meat products); Jowl Trimmer (meat products); Snout Puller (meat products); Splitter, Head (meat products); Temple-Meat Cutter (meat products); Tongue Cutter (meat products).
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
525.684-038 OFFAL SEPARATOR (meat products)
Separates edible portions of animal viscera from offal, performing any combination of following tasks: Cuts away such organs and glands from adjoining tissue as heart, sweetbreads, stomach, spleen, gall bladder, liver, and thyroid, using knife.
Skins outer tissue of bung gut with fingers.
Washes parts and places them in containers.
Cuts off ends of oxtails and trims loose tissues, using knife and rotary brush.
Trims excess fat and tissue from muscles, intestines, and organs, using knife.
Separates membrane from gullet and windpipe, inner lining from stomach, and small intestines from large.
Flushes intestines and bladders with water hose and squeezes them to remove water, slime, and foreign matter.
Weighs and sorts viscera, according to condition, and discards diseased or damaged parts.
Bleaches casings (intestines) by soaking them in salt solution.
Stamps plant identification number on edible organs, using rubber stamp.
Brands tails and tongues with electric iron.
May tend machine that washes viscera and flesh parts.
May grind meat.
May be known according to functions performed or part of viscera processed as Beef-Pluck Trimmer (meat products); Bladder Trimmer (meat products); Bung Grader (meat products); Casing Puller (meat products); Liver Trimmer (meat products); Lung Splitter (meat products); Viscera Washer (meat products).
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.684-042 POULTRY KILLER (meat products) alternate titles: sticker
Severs jugular vein with knife to slaughter suspended fowl passing on overhead conveyor.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.684-046 SKINNER (meat products)
Skins sections of animals or whole animals, such as cattle, sheep, and hogs, performing any combination of following tasks as member of a crew: Slits skin on head of carcass, and pulls and cuts connective tissue until head and neck are exposed, using knife.
Severs head from carcass of animal, using knife and cleaver and places it on racks for inspection.
Trims meat or fat from head skins.
Slits remaining hide on carcass from breastbone to crotch.
Pulls, cuts, and forces hand between hide and carcass to break connective tissue and separate it from neck, sides, shoulders, flanks, back, and tail of suspended carcass.
Breaks and severs legs at knee joint, and removes such parts as dew claws, bungs, tails, and genital organs.
Raises cattle from floor, using hoist, and pulls hide off carcass by hand or using pinchers.
Severs and exposes gullet and windpipe on small stock, using knife, and ties gullet to prevent leakage of fluid when viscera is removed.
Slits womb of cattle with knife to remove slunk (unborn calf).
Shackles neck of slunk and pulls off skin, using winch.
May saw brisket bone on cattle.
May skin pork, using drawknife.
May be designated according to kind of animal or portion of carcass skinned as Backer (meat products); Calf Skinner (meat products); Cattle Header (meat products); Slunk Skinner (meat products).
May be designated: Cattle Dropper And Pritcher (meat products); Leg Skinner (meat products); Shoulder Puncher (meat products); Small-Stock Facer (meat products).
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M2 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.684-050 STICKER, ANIMAL (meat products)
Severs jugular vein of previously stunned animals with knife to prepare animals for butchering: Positions neck of animal suspended from overhead rail or shackled on table for sticking.
Thrusts knife into throat of animal and twists blade to locate and sever jugular vein.
May shackle and suspend animal before sticking [SHACKLER (meat products)].
May sever head and remove skin with knife, after blood has drained.
May be designated according to animal killed as Calf Sticker (meat products); Cattle Sticker (meat products); Hog Sticker (meat products); Sheep Sticker (meat products).
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M2 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
525.684-054 TRIMMER, MEAT (meat products)
Trims fat, skin, tendons, tissues, and ragged edges from meat cuts, such as loins, spareribs, butts, hams, rounds, sirloins, fillets, and chops, using meat-hook and knife: Trims meat and fat from bones and places trimmings and bones in separate containers.
Trims fatback from hog bellies and cuts bellies into specified shapes, using knife.
Feeds bacon bellies through rolls to flatten bellies to prescribed thickness.
May wash or scrape dirt and blood from meat.
May be designated according to section of meat trimmed as Belly Trimmer (meat products); Butt Trimmer (meat products); Fatback Trimmer (meat products); Loin Trimmer (meat products); Spareribs Trimmer (meat products).
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.684-058 TURKEY-ROLL MAKER (meat products)
Cuts, bones, and sews parts of eviscerated turkeys together to form turkey roll, using knife and needle and thread: Cuts legs, wings, thighs, and whole skin from turkey and sews together wing holes in carcass.
Cuts breast meat from bones and sews two portions of meat together.
Rolls meat, places roll on opened turkey skin, overlaps skin on meat, and sews ends together to form roll.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.685-010 BAND-SAW OPERATOR (meat products)
Tends electrically powered bandsaw that cuts portions from hams to prepare hams for smoking, curing, or packing processes: Lifts ham from meat tank onto saw table, using meat hook.
Presses button to start saw and adjusts saw gauges according to size of ham.
Pushes and guides ham into saw blade by hand or with wooden device to cut shank from ham or to remove tip from shank.
Pushes sawed meat onto conveyor for further processing.
May tend bandsaw that cuts poultry into serving pieces for packaging.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.685-014 CASING-RUNNING-MACHINE TENDER (meat products) alternate titles: casing runner; shirring tender
Tends machine that gathers casings into short lengths on horns (metal nozzles of sausage-stuffing machine) to facilitate stuffing of casings with emulsified meat: Places reel of flattened casings on holder of gathering machine.
Threads casing between feed rollers, onto tube, and onto take-up reel.
Starts machine that automatically expands and rounds casings.
Cuts rounded casings from reel into specified lengths, using cutting attachment on machine.
Places horn over water pipe, fits casing over end of horn, and turns valve to flow water through pipe and into casing to facilitate gathering of casing on horn.
Places horn between two cone-shaped rollers which force and gather casing lengths over horn.
Removes loaded horn and places horn in container.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.685-018 DEHAIRING-MACHINE TENDER (meat products)
Tends equipment that dehairs slaughtered hogs preparatory to dressing: Turns steam and water valves to fill scalding tank with water and heat it to specified temperature.
Starts machine conveyors, and releases hogs shackled to overhead rail to drop them into tank by tripping lever on shackle or prying shackle loose with steel bar.
Pushes hogs through vat and into dehairing machine, using pole, or hooks hog's leg to conveyor chain that pulls hog through tank and dehairing machine.
May cut slit in leg to expose tendon for hooking to conveyor chain.
Opens exit door of machine and pulls carcass onto conveyor.
May be known according to specific task performed as Dropper, Dehairing Machine (meat products); Feed-in Tender, Dehairing Machine (meat products); Pull-Through Hooker (meat products); Scalder (meat products).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M2 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
525.685-022 HIDE PULLER (meat products)
Tends machine that pulls hides from carcass: Pulls lever to position clamps on each side of carcass.
Places ends of hide previously separated from carcass into clamps and pulls lever to lock hide in place.
Starts machine that forces carcass forward, tearing off hide.
Rips brisket open to expose viscera, using portable power saw.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.685-026 POULTRY-PICKING MACHINE TENDER (meat products)
Tends machines that scald, remove feathers, singe, and wash slaughtered poultry preparatory to eviscerating and disjointing: Adjusts clearance between revolving brushes of machine to achieve maximum feather removal without bruising or tearing skin of poultry.
Scans poultry emerging from picking machines to determine if poultry are scalded to specifications and turns steam valves to increase or decrease temperature levels.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.685-030 SKIN-PEELING-MACHINE OPERATOR (meat products)
Tends machine that removes cellophane or plastic covering from smoked meat products, such as link-sausages, frankfurters, and wieners, to produce skinless variety: Turns setscrews to adjust skinning mechanism according to size of product.
Starts machine and feeds strand of linked-meat into machine.
Peels remaining fragments of covering from product, using knife.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.686-010 CASING CLEANER (meat products)
Feeds animal intestines into machine rollers that prepares them for use as sausage casings: Soaks intestines in vats of warm water to loosen waste matter and deposits.
Separates soaked intestines and removes loosened matter.
Feeds intestines between crushing and finishing rolls that strip (squeezes out) lime, fat, and mucus, and roll casing into shape.
Measures and ties casings into bundles, and packs bundles in salt for shipment.
Unpacks cured casings and soaks them for subsequent processing into sausage casings.
May clean and flush animal stomachs for use as casings.
May adjust tension on machine rollers.
May be designated according to function performed as Casing Packer (meat products); Casing Soaker (meat products); or machine tended as Casing-Machine Operator (meat products).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.686-014 CONVEYOR LOADER II (meat products)
Guides dehaired hogs from stationary rail to moving chain conveyor.
Lifts first stop bar to allow specified number of dehaired hogs to roll along suspended rail to second stop bar and then lowers bar.
Lifts second stop bar and pushes specified number of hogs into moving chain conveyor.
May remove empty gambrels (hog-suspended attachments) from hogs and place them on return conveyor.
May be designated according to type of conveyor loaded as Cooler-Conveyor Loader (meat products).
GOE: 06.04.40 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.686-018 HEAD-MACHINE FEEDER (meat products)
Feeds machines that automatically pull snouts or jawbones from hog heads and split heads to prepare meat for further processing: Cuts jawbone joints and sides and front of snout to prepare parts for pulling process, using knife.
Positions and holds head on bed of automatic machines to pull snout or jawbone from head or to split head in half.
May trim cheek meat from head with knife subsequent to removal of jawbone.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.686-022 SKINNING-MACHINE FEEDER (meat products)
Feeds machine that skins pork pieces, such as fatbacks, jowls, hams, and bacon, preparatory to curing: Turns crank to raise or lower knife according to thickness of meat.
Places unskinned piece on conveyor that moves it under machine knife that skins meat.
Trims remaining skin fragments with knife.
May skin pork by hand, using drawknife.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.687-010 ANIMAL EVISCERATOR (meat products) alternate titles: gutter
Eviscerates cattle, hogs, lambs, and small animals, performing any combination of following tasks: Slits body cavity of carcass, reaches inside abdominal cavity and cuts membranes holding intestines.
Inserts spiral rod in gullet to sever gullet and windpipe from other neck tissue.
Cuts bung from intestines and ties intestines, bladder, bung, and gullet to prevent leakage of contents.
Pulls intestines from carcass, trims off fat, and dumps them into gut truck or conveyor pan.
Cuts out glands, ovaries, sweetbreads, liver, heart, lungs, kidneys, spleen, and spermatic cord, places them on conveyor, in containers, or throws them down chute.
Cuts bruises, blemishes, and ragged tissue from carcass.
Cuts skin from tail to shoulders to bisect carcass.
Severs head from carcass.
May wash viscera and carcass, using hose.
Patches leaks in intestines, using skewer.
May break and bind hoofs of lambs or sheep.
May be designated according to function performed as Bruise Trimmer (meat products); Leak Patcher (meat products); Weasand Rodder (meat products); or part of animal eviscerated as Belly Opener (meat products); Bung Dropper (meat products); Bung-Gut Tier (meat products).
May be designated: Caul-Fat Puller (meat products); Gut Puller (meat products); Gut Sorter (meat products); Leaf-Fat Scraper (meat products); Rabbit Dresser (meat products).
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M2 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
525.687-014 CASING SPLITTER (meat products)
Slits cured intestines lengthwise, using knife.
Presses intestines flat and stacks them in piles for subsequent production of surgical sutures and violin and tennis racket strings.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
525.687-018 CONVEYOR LOADER I (meat products)
Pulls spreads (metal rods inserted in breast of hog halves to separate parts and allow circulation of air) from breast of suspended hog halves preparatory to storage in cooling room.
Drops spreads into barrel.
Pushes halves along overhead monorail to chain conveyor which carries halves into cooler.
May count and record number of halves processed.
GOE: 06.04.40 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.687-022 COOLER ROOM WORKER (meat products)
Stores and prepares dressed meat for further processing or shipment, performing any combination of tasks in cooler room of slaughtering plant: Examines carcasses to determine condition of meat, such as hardness, softness, and oiliness prior to cutting.
Records information on inspection tag.
Weighs carcass on conveyor scale and records weight on production sheet.
Trims excess fat from meat, using knife.
Cuts carcasses into quarters, using knife and meat saw.
Stamps predetermined grade on meat, using rubber stamp, and attaches date tags.
Brands carcasses and meat products with electric iron.
Pushes carcasses, or meat cuts, suspended from conveyor, from killing and dressing floor to cooler room or between departments.
Separates cuts of meat according to weight, and grade.
Pushes truck, filled with pieces of meat, glands, and organs, into cooling room and places them in pans or hangs them on racks.
Transports containers of tallow to cooler room and other departments, using handtruck.
Carries meat from shipping platform and loads it into delivery truck.
Places trolleys on conveyor rails, and cleans and greases rails.
Washes floor and containers with hose and shovels fresh sawdust onto floor.
May shroud carcasses [SHROUDER (meat products)].
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M2 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.687-026 DRY CURER (meat products) alternate titles: salter
Cures meat products, such as pork, ham, bacon, or casings preparatory to smoking: Pushes sacks of such materials as sugar, sodium nitrate, and salt to curing room, using handtruck or cart.
Weighs out specified amounts of materials and mixes them by hand or in mixing machine.
Packs and arranges meat in boxes, vats, tierces, or piles, and sprinkles mixture over each layer.
Sweeps excess mixture from meat with broom.
Rearranges layers after specified time to circulate air around meat.
Dips ham hocks in brine solution, sprinkles soda on them, and hangs them on rack for curing.
May be designated according to product cured as Belly Packer (meat products); Casing Salter (meat products); Ham-Hock Mopper (meat products); Salt-Bellies Overhauler (meat products).
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.687-030 GAMBRELER (meat products) alternate titles: hanger-off
Hangs animal carcasses on overhead rail preparatory to dressing: Slits skin to expose tendons in hind ankles, using knife, and inserts $T3gamb stick$T1 (hooked metal or wooden rod) between tendon and ankle bone to spread legs.
Hooks gamb stick to trolley on overhead rail and pushes carcasses to next work station.
Cuts flesh between toes of carcass and removes toenails.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.687-034 GAMBRELER HELPER (meat products)
Supplies GAMBRELER (meat products) with $T3gamb sticks$T1 and moves animal carcasses to dressing stations: Removes gamb sticks from overhead conveyor and stacks them for use by GAMBRELER (meat products).
Places trolley (two-wheeled device equipped with hanger to which gamb sticks are hooked) onto overhead conveyor rail so that carcasses can be hung.
Positions animal carcasses on table or overhead conveyor.
Pushes carcass on overhead rail to various dressing stations.
May slit leg tendons on carcass, using knife, to facilitate insertion of gamb sticks.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.687-038 HIDE HANDLER (meat products; oils 
Salts (cures) and trims hides to prepare hides for storage or shipment, performing any combination of following tasks: Spreads hides, flesh side up, in layers on pile.
Shovels and spreads salt over each layer of hides to preserve (cure) hides.
Drags cured hides from pile and strikes hide against table to remove caked salt or sweeps salt from hides, using broom.
Trims ears, ragged edges, snout skin, tail, and excess flesh from hide, using knife.
Folds hides, flesh side inward, and ties cord around bundle.
May scan hides for defects, such as holes and brandmarks.
May be designated according to duty performed as Hide Salter (meat products; oils 
GOE: 06.04.27 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.687-042 HIDE INSPECTOR (meat products) alternate titles: green-hide inspector; hide grader; pelt inspector
Inspects animal hides, pelts, and slunk (unborn animal) skins for blemishes and grades them according to condition, size, and weight: Spreads hides, pelts, or skins on floor and examines or probes them with wooden skewer to detect defects, such as grub holes, cuts, brands, and residual meat and fat to determine grade.
Outlines defective areas on diagram.
Records grade of hide on tag according to condition, size, and weight, and attaches tag to hide.
May trim excess fat from flesh, and cut off snout, ears, and tail, using knife.
May place hides in curing vat.
May remove pituitary gland from split sheep skull, using knife.
May weigh hides on platform scale.
May record number and types of grades of hides on production sheets.
GOE: 06.03.02 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
525.687-046 HIDE TRIMMER (meat products; oils 
Trims and cleans animal hides, using knife: Places hide on table and cuts off superfluous fat, flesh, ragged edges, and parts, such as ears, snout, skin, and tail.
Spreads hide on floor, skin side up, to prepare them for inspection.
May separate hides according to size, weight, and condition.
May be designated according to animal hide trimmed as Calfskin Trimmer (meat products); Cow Trimmer (meat products); Pigskin Trimmer (meat products).
GOE: 06.04.39 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
525.687-050 NECK SKEWER (meat products) alternate titles: neck pinner
Pushes skewer into neck meat of suspended beef halves to pin flabby meat together after head has been removed.
May roll shrouded carcass with handtool to give it a smooth appearance.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.687-054 OFFAL ICER, POULTRY (meat products)
Shovels ice into chicken offal (waste parts) container to cool waste and retard spoilage.
Loads and removes containers, using handtruck.
May tend baling machine to bale wet feathers.
GOE: 06.04.40 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
525.687-058 ORDER RUNNER (meat products)
Prepares smoked meat for packing and further processing, performing any combination of following duties: Removes specified smoked meats from bins and racks, and places them on conveyor leading to packing room.
Wipes salt and moisture from smoked hams.
Inserts hooks in smoked meats and hangs them on racks for further processing.
GOE: 06.04.40 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.687-062 PAINTER, DEPILATORY (meat products)
Prepares sheep pelts for removal of wool: Positions pelt on table, hair side down, and brushes depilatory solution on pelt to loosen wool.
Folds pelt and hangs it on hook to dry.
Loads handtruck with dried pelts and pushes it to WOOL PULLER (leather mfg.; meat products).
GOE: 06.04.27 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
525.687-066 POULTRY BONER (meat products)
Cuts, scrapes and pulls meat from cooked poultry carcasses, using fingers and boning knife: Pulls wings and drumsticks from carcasses.
Cuts along each side of breast plate, using knife, and peels meat from breast, using hands.
Pulls and scrapes meat from rest of carcass, using knife and hands.
Segregates light and dark meat into separate piles.
Discards wastes, such as skin, bones, and gristle, into waste containers.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.687-070 POULTRY DRESSER (agriculture; meat products) alternate titles: tipper
Slaughters and dresses fowl in preparation for marketing, performing any combination of following tasks: Chops off bird's head or slits bird's throat to slaughter bird, using knife.
Hangs bird by feet to drain blood.
Dips bird into scalding water to loosen feathers.
Holds bird against projecting rubber fingers of rotating drum to remove feathers.
Cuts bird open, removes viscera, and washes bird and giblets.
May pluck chickens by hand.
May be designated according to type of fowl dressed as Chicken Dresser (meat products); Turkey Dresser (meat products).
May be known according to specific duties performed as Poultry Picker (meat products); Poultry Scalder (meat products).
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.687-074 POULTRY EVISCERATOR (meat products)
Butchers and processes poultry performing any combination of following tasks: Severs legs at first joint, using knife, and drops legs into container.
Slits breast skin, removes crop, and places crop on conveyor.
Removes oil sack and slits abdominal wall with knife.
Grasps carcass with hands, opens abdominal cavity, and pulls out viscera.
Separates and washes liver, heart, and viscera and drops them into trays.
Cuts around anus to remove remaining viscera and drops it onto conveyor.
Holds gizzard over machine rollers to remove skin and drops it into washer.
Trims fat from giblet meat with knife and places meat and fat in trays.
May be designated according to part of poultry processed as Foot Cutter (meat products); Gizzard-Skin Remover (meat products); or kind of poultry cleaned as Chicken Cleaner (meat products); Turkey Cleaner (meat products).
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.687-078 POULTRY HANGER (meat products)
Shackles and suspends live or slaughtered poultry from conveyor for killing, scalding, removal of feathers or cleaning.
Removes live poultry from shipping crates, or picks up slaughtered birds from platforms and chilling vats and hangs them by feet, neck, or wings on shackles of conveyor.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
525.687-082 POULTRY-DRESSING WORKER (meat products)
Weighs, wraps, and prepares poultry for shipment or storage, performing any combination of following tasks: Loads dressed poultry into carts in layers, and shovels ice between layers to prevent spoilage.
Pushes filled cart to and from cold storage room.
Wraps dressed poultry in paper and packs it in shipping container.
Weighs poultry and marks weight on container.
May shovel ice into cooling machines.
May load trucks.
May wrap heads of poultry in paper.
May remove crops with knife and sew eviscerated poultry, using needle and twine.
May hang or stack cases of dressed poultry in cold storage room.
GOE: 06.04.38 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.687-086 SHACKLER (meat products) alternate titles: hanger
Chains hind legs of stunned animals, such as cattle, sheep, and hogs, to hoist or conveyor that suspends animals for slaughtering process.
May place trolley hooks or $T3gamb stick$T1 in leg tendon of animal to raise them.
GOE: 06.04.40 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.687-090 SHACTOR HELPER (meat products)
Lifts head of animal suspended from conveyor to facilitate examining and throat-cutting by official as prescribed by Jewish law.
Pushes animal over bleeding trough after cut has been made.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.687-094 SHAVER (meat products)
Removes hair and dirt from hog carcasses preparatory to further processing or marketing, performing any combination of following tasks: Shaves and scrapes suspended carcasses to remove dirt and hair, using knife and scraper.
Pulls off toenails, using hook.
Pulls lever to dip suspended hog into resin tank and peels off hardened resin to remove hair.
Applies hot resin with brush to remove remaining hair.
May remove eyelids, feet, and bruised areas with knife.
May slit ankle joints for insertion of gambrel sticks for hanging carcass prior to shaving.
May be designated according to specific activity performed as Resin Worker (meat products); Toe Puller (meat products).
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.687-098 SINGER (meat products)
Singes hair from carcasses of suspended hogs to prepare them for further processing, using torch.
Inserts end of butcher's steel in nostril of hog to remove hair.
May be designated according to part of hog singed as Hog-Head Singer (meat products).
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.687-102 SKIN GRADER (meat products) alternate titles: skin bundler
Transfers hog-back skins from vat to grading table and measures size and length of skin on graduated grading board.
Separates skins according to size.
GOE: 06.03.02 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.687-106 SLUNK-SKIN CURER (meat products)
Cures slunk (unborn calf) skins in vat of brine solution: Turns valve to fill vat with water and adds salt.
Places slunk skins in vat and stirs them with pole to ensure complete curing.
Removes cured skins from vat and rolls them into ball or places them in barrel for shipment.
GOE: 06.04.34 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.687-110 STEAMER (meat products)
Sprays steam on suspended hog carcasses to remove hair and dirt (scurf).
GOE: 06.04.39 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
525.687-114 STUNNER, ANIMAL (meat products)
Stuns animals, such as cattle, hogs, sheep, or goats, preparatory to slaughtering: Opens gate to allow animal to enter knocking pen or chute.
Moves levers to close squeezing mechanism that immobilizes animal.
Stuns animal by striking it on forehead with sledgehammer, pneumatic hammer, or cartridge-firing stunning device; by shooting it in head; or by placing electric shocking device against head of animal.
Pulls levers to tilt floor of pen and slide animal onto killing floor, or onto conveyors leading to sticking and shackling tables.
May stick, shackle, and suspend animals from overhead conveyors or rails [SHACKLER (meat products); STICKER, ANIMAL (meat products)].
May assist in driving animals into knocking pen or chute.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.687-118 TIER (meat products) alternate titles: roast tier
Rolls and ties cuts of meat to form roasts: Places cut of meat on table and rolls meat into circular shape.
Forces skewer threaded with twine through roll of meat at various points to hold roll in place.
Knots and cuts twine.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
525.687-122 WASHER, CARCASS (meat products)
Sprays suspended animal carcasses with water hose to wash off blood and dirt and pushes carcass along overhead rail to next work station.
May brush or scrape off foreign matter.
May shroud carcass [SHROUDER (meat products)].
GOE: 06.04.39 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
525.687-126 CRAB MEAT PROCESSOR (can.
&
Performs any combination of following tasks in processing crab meat for canning, freezing, or packing: Separates claws from crabs, positions claws in metal holder used to facilitate breaking claw shells, and breaks shells of claws and crabs, using knife or metal rod.
Picks meat from shells, using knife and fingers.
Feels meat for presence of shell and removes shell pieces by hand.
Inspects meat for discoloration and discards meat not meeting company requirements.
Places meat in containers for further processing.
Gathers filled containers of meat, places containers on scale, and adds or removes meat from containers to obtain specified weight.
Closes lids of containers, places containers in cartons, and seals cartons, using tape.
May disjoint legs and body of large crabs, using power saw, and be known as Sawyer (can.
&
May remove crab meat from smaller ends of leg segments, using pedal-controlled air jet, and be known as Blower (can.
&
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 86
526 COOKING AND BAKING OCCUPATIONS, N.E.C.
This group includes occupations, not elsewhere classified, concerned with treating components or products with heat to affect such characteristics as flavor, color, edibility, consistency, and texture.
526.131-010 BAKERY SUPERVISOR (bakery products)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in mixing, dividing, molding, and proofing of dough, and in baking, slicing, and wrapping of bread, pastries, and other bakery products: Examines dough and batter for specified consistency.
Reads charts of fermentation room and ovens to verify specified humidity and temperature.
Oversees operation of automatic machinery, such as rounding, curling, icing, slicing, and wrapping machines to ensure maintenance of specified quality standards and production schedules.
Sets up and adjusts wrapping and slicing machines.
Trains new workers.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
May be designated according to product as Bread Supervisor (bakery products); Cake Supervisor (bakery products).
GOE: 06.01.01 STRENGTH: M GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 8 DLU: 78
526.134-010 COOK, MEXICAN FOOD (food prep., nec)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in preparing, cooking, portioning, and packaging ready-to-serve Mexican food specialties, such as chili, tamales, enchiladas, and tacos (seasoned chili beans wrapped in tortillas): Requisitions ingredients, such as meat, olives, chili, garlic, and spices from storeroom.
Directs activities of workers engaged in feeding and tending grinding and mixing machines, rolling, cutting, and baking tortillas, and stirring and tending food in cooking vessels.
Tastes foods to determine that they meet seasoning specifications.
Supervises workers engaged in portioning and packaging foods.
Frequently performs duties of workers supervised.
May be designated according to food cooked as Cook, Chili (food prep., nec); Cook, Enchilada (food prep., nec); Cook, Taco (food prep., nec); Cook, Tamale (food prep., nec); Cook, Tortilla (food prep., nec).
GOE: 06.01.01 STRENGTH: M GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
526.137-010 POTATO-CHIP-PROCESSING SUPERVISOR (food prep., nec)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in peeling and slicing potatoes, frying potato slices, and inspecting fried potato chips: Examines incoming shipments of potatoes to detect rotten and diseased potatoes.
Tests sample of potatoes in container of water to determine solidity content (degree of solidity) of potatoes, using Nicholson hydrometer (instrument used to measure specific gravity of a solid).
Inserts thermometer into potato to determine temperature of potato shipment.
Routes sample of potatoes from each shipment to POTATO-CHIP FRIER (food prep., nec).
Rejects or accepts potato shipment based on color and crispness of fried chips, number of defective potatoes in shipment, and solidity content and temperature of potatoes.
Inspects potato chips to verify conformance to standards.
Inventories and requisitions supplies.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
526.381-010 BAKER (bakery products)
Mixes and bakes ingredients according to recipes to produce breads, pastries, and other baked goods: Measures flour, sugar, shortening, and other ingredients to prepare batters, doughs, fillings, and icings, using scale and graduated containers [DOUGH MIXER (bakery products) 520.685-234].
Dumps ingredients into mixing-machine bowl or steam kettle to mix or cook ingredients according to specifications.
Rolls, cuts, and shapes dough to form sweet rolls, piecrust, tarts, cookies, and related products preparatory to baking.
Places dough in pans, molds, or on sheets and bakes in oven or on grill.
Observes color of products being baked and turns thermostat or other controls to adjust oven temperature.
Applies glaze, icing, or other topping to baked goods, using spatula or brush.
May specialize in baking one type of product, such as breads, rolls, pies, or cakes.
May decorate cakes [CAKE DECORATOR (bakery products) 524.381-010].
May develop new recipes for cakes and icings.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 7 DLU: 80
526.381-014 BAKER APPRENTICE (bakery products)
Performs duties as described under APPRENTICE (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
526.381-018 BAKER, TEST (grain-feed mills) alternate titles: baker, laboratory; flour tester
Bakes loaves of bread to verify adherence of blended flour to specifications: Weighs equal portions of test flour and standard flour.
Mixes flour and other ingredients and makes batch of dough from each flour.
Records mixing formula and observes water absorption and kneading qualities of each batch to ensure that flour conforms to specifications.
Places loaves in oven.
Examines and compares baked loaves for uniformity of color and texture.
Weighs each loaf and records weights.
May prepare written reports of findings.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
526.381-022 CAKE TESTER (grain-feed mills)
Bakes samples of premixes, such as cake, biscuit, muffin and pancake to test batch prior to packaging: Mixes ingredients and bakes in oven.
Examines baked cake for color, texture, and density.
Records findings on worksheet and determines if cake passes standards.
Issues approval slip for batch meeting standards.
Notifies plant chemist if batch does not meet standards.
May test ingredients to determine cause of cake failure.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
526.381-026 COOK, KETTLE (beverage; can.
&
Cooks fruits, vegetables, meats, condiments, or fish products, preparatory to canning or extraction of byproducts, using cooking equipment: Weighs or measures ingredients according to recipe, using scale or graduated container.
Loads ingredients into kettle or pressure cooker.
Observes thermometer and gauges, turns valve to admit steam to pressure cookers or lights gas burner to heat and cook contents of kettles.
Stirs mixture in kettle to blend and prevent scorching of contents, using hand or power-driven paddles.
Observes cooking process or tests batch liquor with viscosimeter or hydrometer to verify viscosity or specific gravity and to ascertain completeness of cooking process.
Starts pump, opens valve, or tilts or scoops contents of kettle into container to unload cooked contents.
May test batch for sugar content, using refractometer.
May mix ingredients prior to cooking.
May be designated according to material cooked as Cook, Fish Eggs (can.
&
&
&
&
&
&
May be designated: Cook, Mayonnaise (can.
&
&
&
&
&
&
GOE: 06.01.04 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
526.382-010 CONCHE OPERATOR (sugar 
Operates conche machine to heat and agitate refined chocolate mass with cocoa butter to enrich color, flavor, and texture: Pumps specified amount of chocolate mixture into steam-heated stationary tank or rotary drum.
Meters out specified amount of such ingredients as cocoa butter or flavorings.
Turns steam valves and adjusts thermostat to heat contents of tank or drum to specified temperature.
Pushes lever to start agitators and rotate drum.
Pushes levers to change rate of agitation, drum rotation, and temperature, following specified time cycles.
Observes and tastes mixture to evaluate conformity to standard and sends sample to laboratory for analysis.
Adjusts temperature, agitation speed and timing cycle, and adds ingredients, such as cocoa butter and lecithin, according to laboratory findings.
Pumps mixture to storage tank.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
526.382-014 CONFECTIONERY COOKER (sugar 
Controls open-fire or steam-jacketed kettles or batch or continuous pressure cookers to cook candy, gum, or other confectionery ingredients according to formula: Weighs or measures ingredients, such as sugar, corn syrup, butter, and gum base, and adds them to cooking utensil.
Starts agitators to mix ingredients.
Turns valve to admit steam and sets pressure gauge and thermostat to cook ingredients at specified temperature.
Feels batch for specified consistency and verifies percentage of sugar in syrup, using refractometer or hydrometer.
Adjusts steam valve and heating element accordingly.
Opens discharge valve and starts pump or tilts cooker or kettle to pour or dump confection into beaters or onto cooling belts or tables.
May partially cook batch in open kettle and pump it into pressure cooker.
May beat or knead confection to attain specified consistency, as determined by color and texture.
May shovel fondant into remelt kettles and add measured amounts of flavoring and coloring.
May be designated according to type of confectionery cooked as Bonbon-Cream Warmer (sugar 
May be designated: Icing Maker (sugar 
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
526.382-018 CONVERTER OPERATOR (grain-feed mills)
Controls converter to change starch into glucose or corn syrup, and tests products to verify purity (specified dextrose content): Turns valves to admit steam and water into converter.
Introduces starch into converter so that cooking occurs as starch is added.
Detects from sound of cooking process formation of paste, and adds acid, as necessary, to reduce viscosity.
Closes converter and turns valve to attain specified pressure.
Draws off samples, and makes standard iodine and alcohol titration tests.
Turns valves to blow syrup into tank when tests indicate conversion is complete.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L1 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
526.382-022 MOLASSES AND CARAMEL OPERATOR (grain-feed mills)
Controls equipment to cook liquid sugar to produce caramel coloring or molasses: Turns valves to fill vessels with liquid sugar and adds specified amounts of salts or caustic solution.
Observes thermometers and gauges and turns valves to regulate steam pressure and cooking temperature in vessels.
Draws samples of material and performs standard tests to ascertain acid content and specific gravity, and to verify color, using pH meter, hydrometer, and colorimeter.
Records test results.
Turns valves or starts pumps to transfer material to evaporator feed tanks, filter supply tanks, or to storage or tank cars.
May tend filters to remove undesirable solids from caramel coloring.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R3 M2 L3 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
526.382-026 STEAM-OVEN OPERATOR (can.
&
Operates steam oven to parboil tuna fish loins preparatory to canning: Pushes racks of fish loins into oven chamber, and spaces racks to ensure free circulation of heat throughout oven.
Closes oven doors and turns handwheel to secure and seal doors.
Turns valves to admit steam into oven, observes temperature and pressure gauges, and adjusts valve settings to maintain temperature and pressure for specified time.
Turns off heat, opens oven, and pulls racks of fish to cooling area.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
526.485-010 WORT EXTRACTOR (dairy products) alternate titles: malted-milk masher
Tends kettles and separating machines that cook mash and separate resulting liquid (wort): Assembles piping and starts pump or turns valve to start flow of mash from grinder to kettles.
Places time and temperature chart in automatic recorder.
Starts sweep to stir mash.
Turns valve to admit steam into cooking kettle, observes pressure gauge, thermometer, and clock, and cooks mash for specified time at specified temperature.
Drops iodine on mash sample and observes resulting color to determine if mash is sufficiently cooked.
Records time and number of batches run.
Turns valves to pump mash through centrifuge and vibrating filter to remove wort.
Turns sparging valve to spray water over spent grain to recover remaining wort.
Observes ammeter, thermometer, water and mash flowmeters and adjusts valves and pump pressure to prevent overloading of separating machines.
Cleans kettles, piping, centrifuges, filters, and clarifiers.
May pump spent grain through roller press to remove wort.
May operate centrifuge to remove nonsoluble solids from wort.
May push control panel button that automatically sets temperature.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R3 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
526.585-010 OVEN OPERATOR (grain-feed mills) alternate titles: flake-miller helper
Tends ovens and related equipment that toast cereal products, such as flakes, biscuits, and pellets: Lights gas burners and moves control levers to attain specified temperature in ovens.
Starts conveyors that move cereal through oven.
Inspects and feels cereal emerging from oven to determine whether specified color, blister, and consistency is maintained.
Adjusts gas control lever, speed of conveyors, and opens or closes doors on side of oven.
Pushes lever to direct unsuitable cereal into feed bin.
Records bulk and production rate of product, noting time it takes to fill container, and weight of container.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
526.665-010 COOKER, PROCESS CHEESE (dairy products) alternate titles: cook blender
Tends vat to cook blended cheeses or cheese curd and other ingredients to make process cheese: Starts agitator and signals for cheese to be dropped into vat.
Turns steam valve and observes thermometer to heat vat to specified temperature.
Measures or weighs out prescribed ingredients, such as sodium citrate, disodium phosphate, and cream, using scale and measuring glass.
Dumps ingredients into vat.
Cooks mixture at specified temperature for specified time or observes consistency of mixture to determine when it is cooked to specifications.
Pulls lever to drain cheese into hopper or bucket.
May pump cheese through viscolizer to achieve finer texture.
May mix unheated cheese or cheese curd and other ingredients to make cold pack cheese or creamed cheese and be designated Cream-Cheese Maker (dairy products).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
526.665-014 KETTLE TENDER (beverage)
Tends brewing kettle that boils wort and hops preparatory to making beer: Opens valve and starts pump to transfer wort from filter tank to brewing kettle, or signals MASH-FILTER OPERATOR (beverage) to pump wort from filter tank into brewing kettle.
Turns valve to admit steam into kettle steam jacket to boil wort.
Dumps hops into boiling wort.
Observes dials and gauges and adjusts controls to maintain specified pressure and temperature.
Tests sample of wort from kettle for specific gravity, using hydrometer.
Signals HOP STRAINER (beverage) or opens valve and starts pump to transfer unfiltered beer into hop-straining tank.
Tallies and records barrels of wort processed.
Cleans and rinses kettle, using high-pressure water hose.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
526.682-010 BATTER SCALER (bakery products) alternate titles: batter depositor; depositing-machine operator; divider; scaling-machine operator
Operates machine that deposits measured amount of batter into baking pans as pans pass on conveyor: Dumps batter from mixing bowl into machine hopper, using hoist.
Attaches depositing dies to machine and tightens, using wrench.
Adjusts gauge on hopper to measure specified amount of batter.
Weighs filled pans on balance scale to ensure conformity to standards.
Removes filled pans from machine and places on racks.
May be designated according to type of batter used as Cake-Batter Scaler (bakery products).
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
526.682-014 COOK, DOG-AND-CAT FOOD (meat products)
Controls battery of steam-jacketed kettles that cook ingredients for preparation of dog and cat foods: Dumps or pours premeasured amounts of water and ground meat into kettles.
Starts agitator to mix ingredients.
Opens steam valve and observes thermometer reading to heat contents and to maintain specified temperature.
Dumps specified amounts of seasoning, chemical solution, and grain into mixture at designated intervals.
Opens valves to allow mixtures to circulate through other kettles.
Observes mixture for required viscosity and closes valves upon completion of cooking cycle.
Starts pumps to transfer contents from kettles to tank of filling machines.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
526.682-018 COOK, SYRUP MAKER (beverage)
Operates equipment to mix and cook ingredients to produce flavoring extracts and syrup: Scans formula sheet to determine proportion of ingredients required, such as sugar, water, and flavoring.
Pushes buttons to admit automatically metered ingredients into blending tank and to activate mixer.
Observes mixture to ensure that color and consistency conform to company specifications.
Pushes buttons to pump mixture to cooking kettle.
Opens valves to admit steam into pressure cooker to invert sugar, eliminate air, and sterilize syrup.
Observes gauges and adjusts valves to regulate temperature and pressure while cooking mixture.
Presses switch to activate paddles to stir mixture and prevent scorching.
Tests batch to determine viscosity or specific gravity and sugar content, using viscometer, hydrometer, and refractometer.
Presses switches to activate equipment to filter impurities and pump syrup into holding tanks.
Maintains production records.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
526.682-022 DOUGHNUT-MACHINE OPERATOR (bakery products) alternate titles: cruller maker, machine; doughnut-cooking-machine operator; fried-cake maker
Operates machine that shapes and fries doughnuts: Slides block of ejectors (cutters) into machine and tightens them, using wingnuts.
Turns switch to heat frying tank to desired temperature.
Mixes prepared ingredients with specified amount of water in mixing machine to form batter.
Dumps batter into doughnut machine hopper, using chain hoist.
Turns and adjusts valves to control air pressure for ejecting batter into frying tank and to regulate size of doughnuts, temperature and feed of grease, and speed of conveyor.
Starts machine and observes color and verifies weight of doughnuts to ensure conformity to standards.
Dismantles doughnut ejectors for cleaning.
May melt and temper chocolate [CHOCOLATE TEMPERER (bakery products; grain-feed mills)].
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L3 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
526.682-026 MALT ROASTER (beverage)
Controls gas-fired ovens to roast barley malt: Observes temperature gauges, and turns gas valves and ignition switches to start and heat ovens to specified temperatures.
Opens slide gate of hopper to dump malt into oven.
Sets timer to control roasting cycle.
Shuts off ovens and opens water valves to drench roasted malt at end of cycle.
Dumps malt in cooler tubs and pushes to cleaning machine.
Starts conveyor that lifts and dumps malt into cleaning machine.
Opens gate and valves to drop malt into storage bins for bagging.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
526.682-034 RETORT OPERATOR (can.
&
Controls retort chamber (steam pressure cooker) to cook canned foods according to specifications: Pushes trucks or lowers baskets using hoist, or presses buttons to start conveyorized flow of canned foods into chamber of retort.
Closes retort door or lid, and turns wheels or moves levers to seal chamber.
Observes dials and thermometers, and turns valves to admit steam to retort, and control temperature, pressure, and cooking time.
Turns valves to release steam and admit cooling water into chamber to prevent overcooking at end of cooking cycle.
May open retort and move basket of canned food to cooling trough, using hoist.
May record items such as retort number, can size and grade designation, cooking time, and number of pounds pressure on canning report.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R3 M1 L1 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
526.684-010 DOUGHNUT MAKER (bakery products) alternate titles: baker, doughnut; cruller maker
Mixes, forms, and fries dough to produce doughnuts, according to work order: Dumps prepared doughnut mix into mixing-machine bowl, adds water and dehydrated eggs, and starts mixer.
Turns switch on heating unit of frying tank and sets thermostat at specified temperature.
Dumps dough from mixing bowl into hopper of doughnut cutter.
Sets lever to control amount of dough that doughnut cutter will portion to frying tank.
Moves cutter machine back and forth over frying tank and depresses trigger to eject individual doughnuts into hot cooking oil.
Turns doughnuts over in tank, using stick.
Lifts wire tray of fried doughnuts from tank and places it in glazing tank.
Slides trough containing glazing syrup over doughnuts.
May glaze doughnuts, using hand dipper.
May roll dough with rolling pin and form doughnuts with hand cutter.
May lower wire tray of uncooked doughnuts into fryer, using hooks.
May tend automatic equipment that mixes, cuts, and fries doughnuts.
May weigh cut dough and fried doughnuts to verify weight specifications, and adjust controls of equipment accordingly when weights vary from standards.
GOE: 06.02.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M1 L1 SVP: 4 DLU: 78
526.684-014 LUMPIA WRAPPER MAKER (food prep., nec)
Mixes and fries dough to prepare $T3lumpia$T1 wrappers in establishment processing Philippine food specialties: Mixes premeasured ingredients by hand to prepare dough.
Kneads dough to required consistency.
Places griddle on stove to heat griddle.
Shapes and spreads, by hand, specified amount of dough on heated griddle to cook and form lumpia wrappers.
Removes cooked lumpia wrappers from griddle, using fingers, and stores wrappers for further processing or packaging.
Periodically returns dough to freezer to maintain dough consistency.
Cleans equipment and work area.
GOE: 05.10.08 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 86
526.685-010 COOK (meat products)
Tends equipment that bakes, boils, and deep-fat fries meats, such as ham, beef, liver, pork, sausage, tongues, and tripe, to prepare them for further processing: Turns valves to admit water or cooking oil into vat, and steam to heating vat.
Observes gauge and turns valves to maintain specified temperature in vat.
Loads vat with mesh bags, wire cages, metal molds, and sealed cans containing uncooked meat.
Lifts cuts of meat from truck and loads them into vat. Suspends link sausages on holding fixtures in vat.
Turns valve to drain vat, removes cooked meats, and places them on racks or in carts.
Spreads sugar or honey over top of hams and places hams and other meat items in baking oven.
May garnish hams with cherries and pineapple slices.
May add gelatin and other ingredients, such as olives, pickles, and pimientos, to cooked meat and mix them by hand or in machine.
Pours mixture into molds to form gelatinized meat loaf.
May stuff meat loaves into plastic casings, using horn (funnel-shaped tube).
May cook products, such as chili, souse, and head cheese.
May remove bones and fat from cooked meat, using knife.
May grind meat, using grinding machine.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R3 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
526.685-014 COOK, FRY, DEEP FAT (can.
&
Tends deep-fat cookers to fry meats, vegetables, or fish in cooking oil: Empties containers or opens valves to fill cookers with oil.
Sets thermostat to heat oil to specified temperature.
Empties containers of meat, vegetable, or fish into metal basket and immerses basket into vat manually or by hoist.
Sets timer.
Observes color at end of frying time to determine conformity to standards and extends frying time accordingly.
Removes basket from cooker, drains it, and dumps contents onto tray.
May dip foods into batter or dye before frying.
May specialize in a particular food product for canning or freezing or may fry variety of foods for immediate consumption.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
526.685-018 COOK, VACUUM KETTLE (can.
&
Tends vacuum cooker and open kettle to cook fruit and berries preparatory to making jams and jellies: Observes thermometer, turns rheostat and steam valve, or pushes switch or lights burner to heat vacuum cooker and open kettle to specified temperature.
Turns valve to transfer contents of kettle into vacuum cooker.
Observes refractometer on vacuum cooker to determine sugar content and adds ingredients according to formula.
Places container under discharge outlet of distillation jacket of cooker to reclaim esters.
Opens valve or starts pump to transfer contents of vacuum cooker to holding tank or filling machine.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
526.685-022 COOKER (grain-feed mills)
Tends steam-heated pressure cookers to cook cracked and tempered grain for further processing into cereal products: Presses button to load first cooker with measured amount of grain and liquid flavor.
Clamps lid of cooker in place, using wrench.
Moves dials and turns valves to attain specified temperature and pressure in cooker.
Removes lid of cooker and dumps cooked grain onto conveyor after determining that grain has reached specified color and consistency.
Records cooking time and number of batches prepared.
May start automatic equipment that admits steam, rotates cooker, and stops cooker after specified time.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
526.685-026 CORN POPPER (sugar 
Tends one or more gas ovens to pop corn: Lights ovens and starts rotating cone- or drum-shaped perforated oven.
Dumps measured amount of corn into oven.
Places container at discharge end of oven to receive popcorn or starts conveyor to carry corn through screen to remove unpopped kernels.
Moves lever to reverse rotation of oven and to dump unpopped kernels into container beneath oven.
When popping corn by wet method, pushes level to release measured amount of oil into unpopped corn in stationary oven.
May prepare syrup and coat popcorn to make popcorn candy [POPCORN-CANDY MAKER (sugar 
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
526.685-030 OVEN TENDER (bakery products)
Tends stationary or rotary hearth oven that bakes bread, pastries, and other bakery products: Places pans of unbaked goods on blade of long-handled paddle (peel).
Opens oven door and slides loaded peel into oven.
Jerks paddle from under pans to deposit them on hearth.
Observes gauges and turns valves to regulate heat and humidity of oven.
Notes color of products during baking to ensure uniformity of finished products.
Removes baked goods from oven with peel, and places them on tiered racks.
Flips switch to position hearth for loading and unloading when tending rotary hearth oven.
May place bagels into kettle of boiling water, remove bagels from kettle, using ladle, and sprinkle bagels with seasoning prior to placing bagels in oven.
May be designated according to type of oven tended or product baked as Oven Tender, Bagels (bakery products); Peel Oven Tender (bakery products); Rotary-Peel Oven Tender (bakery products).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M1 L1 SVP: 4 DLU: 79
526.685-034 PAN GREASER, MACHINE (bakery products)
Tends machine that automatically coats inside surfaces of baking pans with grease: Places container of grease alongside machine and inserts suction pipe into container.
Starts machine.
Adjusts gauge to regulate spray of grease.
Removes greased pans from machine conveyor and places pans on second conveyor for transfer to batter depositing machine, or stacks pans on racks.
May be designated according to type of pans greased as Bread-Pan Greaser (bakery products); Cake-Pan Greaser (bakery products).
GOE: 06.04.21 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
526.685-038 PIE MAKER, MACHINE (bakery products)
Performs any combination of following duties on pie-machine conveyor line: Loads dough into hopper of pie-dough scaling machine.
Turns hand lever to adjust scaling cylinder of machine to produce lumps of dough of prescribed size.
Removes lumps of dough deposited from scaling machine and places them in dough-rolling-machine hopper.
Turns hand lever to adjust rollers of machine to produce dough disks of desired thickness, catches dough emerging from first set of rollers, and drops dough into second set of rollers.
Catches dough emerging from rolling machine and places it in piepan as it moves on conveyor.
Dumps pie filling from container into hopper of filling machine, using hoist.
Observes pies being filled and adjusts mechanism to regulate feed of filling or fills pies by hand.
Catches dough emerging from rolling machine and places it over filled pies.
Perforates pie covers to identify filling, using hand stamp.
Inserts pan containing pie in pie-crimping machine and depresses pedal to crimp and seal perimeter of pie.
Trims excess dough from pie with knife.
May be designated according to phase of operation performed as Pie Bottomer (bakery products); Pie-Crimping-Machine Operator (bakery products); Pie-Dough Roller (bakery products); Pie Filler (bakery products); Pie Topper (bakery products).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M1 L1 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
526.685-042 POPCORN-CANDY MAKER (sugar 
Tends equipment to cook and mix syrup with popcorn, forming popcorn candy: Weighs, measures, adds, stirs, and cooks ingredients, such as corn syrup, butter, and water in open-fire cooker or steam-jacketed kettle according to formula and specified procedure.
Dumps popped corn into bowl of mixing machine or other container.
Pours syrup over corn and starts agitator to mix corn and syrup for specified time or until coating is complete.
May tend molding press to form popcorn novelties or shapes, such as balls or fritters (disks).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
526.685-046 POTATO-CHIP FRIER (food prep., nec) alternate titles: cooker, chip; potato-chip cooker machine
Tends machine that washes, slices, fries, and salts potatoes to make potato chips: Opens valve to pump preheated cooking oil into cooking vats.
Fills salt hopper.
Adjusts burner controls to maintain specified temperature in cooking vats.
Turns valves to rinse potato slices, and moves levers to control rate of flow of potato slices into cooking vats.
Stirs potato slices to ensure uniform cooking, using paddle or by use of automatic reciprocating rakes.
Observes color of cooked potato chips as they emerge onto conveyors from cooking vats.
Replaces worn blades on slicing heads, using handtools.
May cook potatoes by lowering wire basket of sliced potatoes into vat of cooking oil.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
526.685-050 POTATO-PANCAKE FRIER (food prep., nec)
Tends machine that deep-fries potato pancakes in oil, preparatory to freezing and packaging: Dumps potato batter into hopper of machine that automatically forms and fries pancakes.
Turns valve to add specified amount of frying oil into machine.
Inspects fried pancakes on conveyor to verify specified size and color.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
526.685-054 PRETZEL COOKER (bakery products)
Tends oven that automatically cooks, salts, bakes, and dries pretzels: Lights oven and sets thermostats of cooker, oven, and kiln at specified temperature.
Dumps specified amount of salt, soda, and water into hoppers of oven.
Turns valve to sprinkle salt and to allow soda solution to drain continuously into cooking pit of oven.
Observes progress of uncooked pretzels moving on conveyor into oven, and straightens pretzels, using wire hooked rod.
Tastes baked pretzels, observes their color, and adjusts speed of conveyor or temperature of cooker, oven, and kiln to ensure pretzels conform to color and taste standards.
May place unbaked pretzels on oven conveyor by inverting boards loaded with pretzels.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
526.685-058 THERMOSCREW OPERATOR (can.
&
Tends machine that precooks meat products preparatory to canning: Starts machines and conveyors, and loads meat into grinder to be ground and fed into cooker.
Observes temperature gauge and color of meat during cooking process, and turns valve or adjusts rheostat to maintain specified temperature for prescribed cooking time.
Turns valves to permit flow of cooking fluid into machine and from machine into filtering tanks.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
526.685-062 TRIPE COOKER (meat products)
Tends equipment that cooks tripe to tenderize it preparatory to further processing: Dumps tripe into scalding vat to remove outer skin.
Turns valve to admit water and steam into cooking vat and transfers tripe into vat by hand or using pitchfork.
Observes gauge and regulates valves to maintain specified temperature in vat.
Removes cooked tripe from vat after specified length of time and places it in trays or on racks for chilling.
May cook tongue.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
526.685-066 WAFER-MACHINE OPERATOR (bakery products) alternate titles: waffle baker; waffle-machine operator
Tends machines that automatically deposit and bake batter in molds to form wafers: Lights gas burners to heat baking molds.
Fills hopper of machine with batter.
Starts machine and turns setscrew to regulate amount of batter deposited in mold.
Turns thermostat to adjust temperature of baking molds.
Observes color of baked wafers being ejected onto conveyor to detect defects.
May be designated according to type of wafer made as Sugar-Wafer-Machine Operator (bakery products).
May tend machine that also rolls batter into shape of cones prior to baking and be designated Cone Baker, Machine (bakery products).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
526.685-070 OVEN OPERATOR, AUTOMATIC (bakery products) alternate titles: baker operator, automatic
Tends automatic reel or conveyor type oven that bakes bread, pastries, and other bakery products: Reads work order to determine quantity and type products to be baked.
Turns dials and valves to set operation speed of conveyor, baking time, and temperature controls of baking unit.
Presses buttons to start equipment, and observes gauges to maintain heat according to specifications.
Observes filled baking pans entering oven to determine whether pans are filled to standard, spacing between pans is sufficient to prevent pans jamming together, and speed of pans entering oven is specified speed to control baking time of product in oven.
Observes color of baking product to detect burning or over baking and to verify uniformity of finished products.
Adjusts controls according to procedure or notifies supervisor when conditions require equipment adjustments.
May load and unload ovens.
May be designated according to type of oven controlled as Conveyorized Oven Tender (bakery products); Reel Oven Tender (bakery products).
May tend mixing machine and auxiliary equipment that automatically mixes, shapes, and bakes batter to form fortune cookies and be designated Fortune Cookie Maker (bakery products).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 78
526.686-010 BAKER HELPER (bakery products)
Performs any combination of following tasks in production of baked goods: Moves and distributes bakery supplies and products in and around production area of bakery, using handtrucks, dollies, troughs, and rack trucks.
Weighs and measures ingredients, such as sugar, flour, yeast, syrup, and dough.
Lifts and dumps containers of materials to help load and unload machines, bins, hoppers, racks, and ovens.
Feeds lumps or sheets of dough into hopper or between rolls of machine.
Cleans equipment, using brushes, cleanser, and water.
Greases, lines, or dusts pans or boards preparatory to receiving product for baking.
May cut, turn, or twist dough into specified products and fill baking pans with dough.
May observe and rearrange baked products on conveyor before products enter slicing machine.
May tend equipment that dumps baked bread from pans onto conveyor for further processing.
May push racks of bakery products into designated areas to await further processing.
May be designated according to worker assisted as Batter-Mixer Helper (bakery products); or according to machine operator assisted as Cracker-And-Cookie-Machine Operator Helper (bakery products); Doughnut-Machine-Operator Helper (bakery products); Cookie-Mixer Helper (bakery products); Dividing-Machine-Operator Helper (bakery products); Dough-Mixer Helper (bakery products); Ingredient-Scaler Helper (bakery products).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 86
526.687-010 POTATO-CHIP SORTER (food prep., nec)
Observes potato chips on conveyor and removes chips that are burned, discolored, or broken.
GOE: 06.03.02 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
526.687-014 STARCHMAKER (sugar 
Makes starch molds in which gum or jelly candy is formed, using manual press: Fills trays with starch and levels filled trays, using straightedge implement.
Slides molding plate into press and secures it with thumbscrews.
Pushes starch-filled tray under molding plate and pulls lever to press plate into starch, forming mold cavities.
May tend machine that automatically empties molded candy from trays, refills them with starch, and reprints mold cavities [MOLDING-MACHINE-OPERATOR HELPER (sugar 
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
529 OCCUPATIONS IN PROCESSING OF FOOD, TOBACCO, AND RELATED PRODUCTS, N.E.C.
This group includes occupations, not elsewhere classified, concerned with processing food, tobacco, and related products.
529.130-010 SUPERVISOR, CANDY (sugar 
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in cooking, forming, coating, wrapping, and packing candy: Trains workers in setting up and operating machines, such as depositors, enrobers, and cutters.
Inspects candy to verify specified size, shape, solidification, gloss, and weight.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
May be designated according to operation as Supervisor, Enrobing (sugar 
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.130-014 SUPERVISOR, CHOCOLATE-AND-COCOA PROCESSING (sugar 
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in producing and packaging chocolate and cocoa products: Designates quantities and types of beans to clean, roast, blend, alkalize, and grind to make chocolate liquor.
Indicates time sequence, quantity, type of chocolate liquor, and formulas to use to make cocoa and coatings.
Trains workers in setting up and adjusting machines and equipment to achieve standards and correct malfunctions.
Reviews laboratory reports on quality control of products in process, such as shell content of nibs, fat content of cocoa powder, viscosity of coatings, and moisture content of alkalized beans.
Reads thermometers and pressure gauges on storage tanks and pipelines to verify specified temperature of liquids to prevent solidification.
Oversees roasting of cocoa beans for adherence to flavor, taste, moisture content, and color standards.
Inspects nibs for shell content and fineness of cracking.
Inspects grinding of nibs for specified fineness of chocolate liquor.
Tests liquor for fineness.
Directs mixing, refining, tempering, conching, and molding operations to make sweet chocolate and coatings.
Inspects products for specified viscosity, texture, color, and taste.
Directs workers engaged in insect and rodent control and in cleaning production and storage areas.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.01.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 8 DLU: 77
529.130-018 SUPERVISOR, COFFEE (food prep., nec)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in grinding, blending, roasting, and packaging of coffee.
Requisitions supplies.
Sets up machines, such as grinders and filling machines.
Performs duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.130-022 SUPERVISOR, FILTRATION (sugar 
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in filtering, clarifying, and storing sugar liquors, slurries, and sweetwaters.
Observes automatic recording devices to verify specified temperature, density and alkalinity of liquors, slurries, and sweetwaters.
Performs duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.130-026 SUPERVISOR, NUT PROCESSING (can.
&
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in cracking, sorting, blanching, cutting, grinding, roasting, packing, and shipping nuts: Sets up and repairs nut-processing machines, such as nut-cracking machine, meat grading machine, or nut-cutting machines.
Observes operation of machines to detect malfunctions or to detect worn parts.
Inspects nuts to verify conformance with plant standards.
May install and service showcases in retail stores to display nut products.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: M GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.130-030 SUPERVISOR, PULP HOUSE (sugar 
Supervises and coordinates activities of pulp-house workers engaged in processing sugar-beet pulp into cattle fodder: Consults with SUPERVISOR, BEET END (sugar 
Adjusts automatic presses to press water from pulp.
Moves controls to start equipment, such as elevators, scrolls, and conveyors, and to regulate flow of molasses into mingler scroll.
Observes gauges and automatic recorders to verify specified temperatures in driers.
Directs workers in clearing blockades and cleaning spillages.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: M GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.130-034 SUPERVISOR, REFINING (sugar 
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in storing and distributing liquors and syrups, and in boiling, crystallizing, and drying sugar.
Reads records and gauges to verify that equipment is operating according to standards.
Performs duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.01.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.130-038 SUPERVISOR, SOFT SUGAR (sugar 
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in centrifuging, screening, distributing, and packing brown sugar: Sets timing on centrifuge cycles to control color of product.
Orders packing machine operators to set up machines.
Turns valves and opens gates to distribute sugar to packing station.
Directs workers in washing equipment when changing color of pack.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: M GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.130-042 SUPERVISOR, WHITE SUGAR (sugar 
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in centrifuging, granulating, and storing sugar: Sets timing controls on centrifuges for spinning, washing, and predrying cycles.
Observes operation of equipment and temperature and flowmeters to verify specified flow of product between stations.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.131-010 CELLAR SUPERVISOR (beverage)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in operation of winery cellars: Directs workers in crushing grapes, fermenting and fortifying juice, finishing and aging wine, operating portable pumps to transfer wine, and racking wine (filtering).
Inspects fermentation tanks for cleanliness and operation of valves and other accessories.
Orders filling of tanks and adds yeast culture to must in tanks to promote fermentation.
Turns valves to circulate ferment through heat exchangers or other devices to maintain vintage at specified temperature.
Observes gauges and records readings.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: M GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 8 DLU: 77
529.131-014 SUPERVISOR, DAIRY PROCESSING (dairy products)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in producing dairy products, such as milk, butter, cheese, and evaporated milk in liquid, solid, or powdered form: Directs workers in receiving and testing milk and in operations, such as pasteurizing, separating, evaporating, drying, cooling, and storing dairy products.
Feels, tastes, and smells cheese samples to determine types of cheeses required for specified blend.
Examines samples of evaporated milk, orders changes in cooking temperature, and adds measured amounts of calcium or phosphate to milk to obtain specified texture and viscosity.
May add specified amount of lactic ferment cultures to pasteurized milk to develop starter for sour dairy products, such as buttermilk, cheese, or sour cream.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
May be designated according to type of product as Butter Production Supervisor (dairy products); Cheese Production Supervisor (dairy products); Instant-Powder Supervisor (dairy products); or according to process as Pasteurizing Supervisor (dairy products).
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.132-010 CUSTOM-FEED-MILL OPERATOR (grain-feed mills)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers in operation of feed mill that grinds grain and mixes feed to customer's specifications.
May operate grinders and auxiliary equipment to grind and mix feed.
May compute charges and collect payment.
May purchase supplies and equipment and keep financial records.
May manage commercial feed store in conjunction with mill to sell grain, stock feed, fertilizer, and other products to retail trade.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 05.12.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.132-014 PLANT SUPERVISOR (grain-feed mills)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in drying, shelling, grading, and bagging hybrid seed corn: Regulates valves to maintain specified temperature of drying room.
Periodically inspects and samples corn during various stages of processing for accuracy of operation, and for germination and purity.
Tags and stores bagged grain.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.01.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.132-018 SUPERVISOR, BEET END (sugar 
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in extracting sugar juice from sugar beets, processing juice into sugar liquor, and processing beet pulp into cattle fodder: Reads production schedules and beet delivery reports and assigns workers to such duties as fluming and washing beets, controlling equipment to slice and extract juice from beets, and processing juice through carbonation, filtration, and evaporation stages to obtain standard sugar liquor.
Reads automatic recording devices and gauges and operating logs at various stations to ascertain that juice is being extracted and processed into standard sugar liquor, according to prescribed procedures, and that standard liquor meets density and concentration requirements.
Prepares production and employee time reports.
Directs workers in repairing and overhauling processing equipment during slack periods.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.132-022 SUPERVISOR, BOTTLE-HOUSE CLEANERS (beverage)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in cleaning bottle house, and bottling equipment and machines: Trains workers in operation of equipment.
Observes draining, dismantling, and cleaning of machines, such as bottle washing, can dumping, case unloading, filling, labeling, and pasteurizing machines.
Examines machines for conformance to cleanliness criteria and standards.
Reads gauges and thermometers on pasteurizing and bottle washing machines to verify specified operating temperatures.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.132-026 SUPERVISOR, BREW HOUSE (beverage)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers in brewhouse of malt liquor establishment: Trains workers in operation of equipment.
Inspects and evaluates milling, mashing, brewing, and cooling operations to determine conformance to laboratory report specifications and established production procedures.
Observes time, temperature, and pressure recording charts on machines and compares readings with work order specifications.
Conducts iodine tests of mash and specific gravity tests of malt to determine completeness of mashing operations.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 8 DLU: 77
529.132-030 SUPERVISOR, CEREAL (grain-feed mills)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in processing and packaging grains for cereal or animal feed products, according to knowledge of plant operations, processing machinery, and equipment: Directs experienced workers to instruct new workers in operation of grinders, cookers, driers, flaking rolls, ovens, frosting and packaging equipment.
Evaluates performance of new workers for understanding of equipment and duties.
Visually and tactually inspects grain mill products in process for conformance to plant standards.
Reads laboratory tests results to verify specified moisture content of products.
Directs workers to supply packaging lines with cartons, shipping cases, and other packaging materials.
Investigates and directs repair of malfunctioning equipment based on knowledge of equipment and process.
Maintains time and production records.
May perform processing tasks in worker's absence.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L4 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.132-034 SUPERVISOR, CIGAR-MAKING MACHINE (tobacco)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in operating cigar-making machines: Weighs and measures cigars to ensure conformance to standards.
Adjusts machines and notifies MAINTENANCE MECHANIC (any industry) of machine malfunction.
Trains workers in machine operation.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.132-038 SUPERVISOR, COOK ROOM (can.
&
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in brining, syruping, lidding, or capping containers of food products.
Controls temperature of atmospheric (conveyor-type) cooking machines.
Performs duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.132-042 SUPERVISOR, DRIED YEAST (food prep., nec)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in extruding, drying, milling, inspecting, and packaging dried yeast: Observes temperature and humidity controls on conveyor belt-type drier for adherence to specifications.
Reviews laboratory reports and inspects dried and milled yeast for specified fineness.
Examines packaged yeast at various stages and directs workers to adjust malfunctioning machines.
Inspects equipment and machine to ensure adherence to sanitary specifications.
Trains workers in machine and equipment operations.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L4 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.132-046 SUPERVISOR, DRY-STARCH (grain-feed mills)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in treating raw-starch suspensions with chemical solutions, such as acids and alkalies, and in operating pumps, heating units, agitators, filters, shakers, centrifugal separators, and driers to produce variety of dry-starch products: Reads thermometers, instrument-control meters, dials, and gauges to verify specified processing procedures.
Operates equipment, adjusting valves, levers, and switches to control flow of product, temperatures, moisture content, and other characteristics.
Trains workers in operation of equipment.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.132-050 SUPERVISOR, FEED HOUSE (grain-feed mills)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in grinding and drying byproducts of starch (bran and gluten) in preparation of stock food: Trains workers in operation of equipment.
Examines machinery, valves, pumps, and conveyors to detect malfunctions resulting in leakage, spillage, overflow, and choke-up.
Reads laboratory test reports to verify specified chemical characteristics, such as protein content of product.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 8 DLU: 77
529.132-054 SUPERVISOR, FEED MILL (grain-feed mills)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in grinding, screening, and mixing stock and poultry feed from grain and other ingredients according to specifications: Directs grinding of feed materials, such as grain, alfalfa, and corn cobs in hammer mills, or attrition mills, or roll grinders and mixing of ground feed with malt, mash, molasses, salt, soda, vitamins, and other ingredients, according to formula.
Oversees cooking, cooling, and pelletizing of feed.
May supervise packing of feed and storage and shipment of feed products.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
May be designated according to type of feed as Poultry Feed Supervisor (grain-feed mills).
GOE: 06.01.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M3 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.132-058 SUPERVISOR, FERMENTING CELLARS (beverage)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in fermenting liquid wort: Moves controls of refrigeration equipment to maintain specified temperatures in cellar.
Observes time, temperature, and pressure recording charts on fermenting tanks and compares with job order specifications.
Directs workers in yeast pitching, fermenting, and pumping operations to ensure conformance to specified production procedures.
May test specific gravity of wort.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.132-062 SUPERVISOR, GRAIN AND YEAST PLANTS (beverage)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in drying, bagging, and loading spent brew mash grains and surplus fermenting yeast: Coordinates drying, bagging, and car-loading operations and requisitions materials to meet daily production schedules.
Measures moisture content of grain and yeast, using hygrometer.
Moves controls of drying machine to regulate moisture content of grains and yeast.
Marks or specifies railroad cars to be loaded with bagged or bulk grain.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.132-066 SUPERVISOR, LIQUID YEAST (food prep., nec)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in production of yeast cream used in manufacture of bakers' yeast and food yeast: Trains workers in machine and equipment operation.
Observes production operations and reviews laboratory results of liquid yeast.
Inspects equipment to ensure adherence to sanitary specifications.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.132-070 SUPERVISOR, MALTED MILK (dairy products)
Supervises workers engaged in making, bottling, and packaging malted milk powder: Assigns production runs to operators of mashing, evaporating, drying, blending, filling, and casing machines.
Tours department to observe machines, production records, and automatic recording charts for specified temperature, pressure, liquid level, and machine setting.
Trains workers in operation of masher, centrifuge, separator, evaporator, drum drier, blender, filler and packager machines, and auger, roller, or vacuum conveyor systems.
Examines materials and transporting equipment of suppliers for unsanitary conditions to prevent processing of substandard powder.
May rerun laboratory test for such quality factors as moisture or sediment in malted milk powder.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: M GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.132-074 SUPERVISOR, MILL HOUSE (grain-feed mills)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in processing grain for use in manufacturing starch, sugar, and feed products: Directs workers in softening and expanding grain kernels in acid solution (steep-water), grinding grain in mills, and in separating elements, such as starch and gluten from milled grain.
Feels milled grain to determine fineness of grind.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.132-078 SUPERVISOR, NUTRITIONAL YEAST (food prep., nec)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in pasteurizing and drying yeast cream and milling and packing yeast for use as food: Examines dried yeast sheet for color and thickness and milled yeast for fineness.
Trains workers in equipment and machine operation and adjustment.
Inspects equipment and machines to ensure adherence to sanitary specifications.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L4 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.132-082 SUPERVISOR, SOAKERS (beverage)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in washing beer bottles: Trains workers in operation of machines.
Examines soaked bottles for cleanliness.
Reads gauges to verify temperature of soda solution in machines, and directs workers to regulate strength of solution.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.04.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
529.132-086 SUPERVISOR, STEFFEN HOUSE (sugar 
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers in processing sugar-beet molasses, and in operating kilns to produce lime and carbon-dioxide gas used for carbonation of raw sugar-beet juice.
Directs workers in diluting molasses, mixing lime with solution, and recovering hot and cold saccharate cake and filtrate from filter presses.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 8 DLU: 77
529.132-090 SUPERVISOR, SUGAR HOUSE (grain-feed mills)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in cooling, crystalizing, separating, and drying sugar liquors to produce granular sugar: Reads instrument-control meters, thermometers, and gauges to verify specified processing procedures.
Examines valves, pumps, and conveyors to detect malfunctions resulting in leakage, spillage, overflow, or choke-up.
Trains workers in operation of equipment.
Supervises workers engaged in production of caramel color, molasses, and other related products from liquid sugar.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 8 DLU: 77
529.132-094 SUPERVISOR, SUGAR REFINERY (grain-feed mills)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in converting liquid starch to liquid sugars: Trains workers in operation of equipment.
Reads instrument dials in control room of automatic plant, and thermometers, meters, and gauges at stations in plant to verify specified processing procedures.
Examines valves, pumps, and conveyors to detect malfunctions resulting in leakage, spillage, overflow, or choke-up.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.01.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 8 DLU: 77
529.132-098 SUPERVISOR, TANK STORAGE (beverage) alternate titles: supervisor, finishing department
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in processing, storing, and aging beer: Inspects beer for clarity and color to determine need for aging, filtering, blending, carbonating, and storing.
Moves controls of refrigeration equipment to maintain specified temperatures in tank-storage department.
May conduct alcoholic content, carbonization, and specific gravity tests to determine conformance of beer to laboratory and production specifications, using hydrometer and other test apparatus.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 05.02.07 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 8 DLU: 77
529.132-102 SUPERVISOR, TEA AND SPICE (food prep., nec)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in receiving, processing, packaging, and storing dry food products, tea, and spices used in food preparations, such as gelatin desserts, soups, and liquid extracts: Mixes ingredients for liquid extracts and flavoring, following formula.
Requisitions materials.
Trains workers in machine operations.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.132-106 SUPERVISOR, WASH HOUSE (beverage)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in washing, pitching, and repairing metal beer kegs and barrels: Trains workers in machine operation.
Adjusts keg washing and pitching machines.
Observes temperature gauges and turns steam valve to maintain specified operating temperatures and speeds.
Examines cleaned and pitched kegs for conformance to specifications.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.132-110 SUPERVISOR (food prep., nec)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in mixing, pressing, and drying macaroni products: Confers with supervisor of previous shift and management to determine production needs, such as changes of press dies, production rate increases, or changes in dryer temperatures as recommended by quality control personnel.
Informs workers of production changes, and monitors control panels of mixing, pressing, and drying machines and equipment to determine whether control settings meet company specifications.
Observes products in various stages of process to determine whether products meet requirements for size, color, texture, and smoothness; and reads temperature and humidity charts, drying chamber charts, and entries in daily reports to determine compliance with company standards.
Informs workers involved with specific steps in process to bring products into compliance with standards.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
May be designated according to process supervised as Supervisor, Long Goods (food prep., nec); Supervisor, Short Goods (food prep., nec).
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 6 DLU: 86
529.135-010 COOKING, CASING, AND DRYING SUPERVISOR (tobacco)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in cooking $T3casing fluid,$T1 and casing and drying tobacco for further processing into chewing tobacco.
Trains new workers in machine operation.
Performs duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.135-014 SUPERVISOR, CURED-MEAT PACKING (meat products)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in wrapping and packing sausages, sliced bacon, sides of bacon, and ham: Trains workers in tending skin-peeling machine and other equipment.
Directs workers on bacon line in activities, such as molding sides of bacon, slicing and weighing bacon, and inserting bacon into packages.
Directs workers on sausage line in activities, such as peeling sausages (removing skins) by hand or machine, inserting sausages in containers, hand or machine wrapping sausage container, and packaging containers of sausage in cartons for shipment.
Inspects cured meats for specified color and texture to verify quality of product.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.04.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L2 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.137-010 PREPARATION SUPERVISOR (can.
&
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in receiving, sorting, preparing, and processing food products, such as fruits, vegetables, and fish, for canning or freezing.
Performs duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
May be designated according to type of preserving process as Preparation Supervisor, Canning (can.
&
&
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 78
529.137-014 SANITARIAN (any industry) alternate titles: sanitation supervisor
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in duties concerned with sanitation programs in food processing establishment: Inspects products and equipment for conformity to federal and state sanitation laws and plant standards.
Directs food handlers and production personnel in sanitary and pest-control procedures.
Directs cleaning of equipment and work areas.
Inspects premises for unsanitary practices and conditions.
Examines incoming shipments of food ingredients for foreign matter, such as insects, poisons, or dirt, and gathers samples of ingredients for laboratory analysis.
Confers with management and production personnel on sanitation problems, and recommends changes in equipment, plant layout, lighting, ventilation, or work practices to improve sanitation standards and purity of product.
Compiles required reports regarding regular inspections, sanitation violations, and steps taken to resolve deficiencies.
Routes reports to designated plant personnel.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
May be designated according to type of establishment as Supervisor, Bakery Sanitation (bakery products); Supervisor, Dairy Sanitation (dairy products).
GOE: 11.10.03 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 79
529.137-018 SUGAR-REPROCESS OPERATOR, HEAD (sugar 
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in reprocessing damaged refined sugars: Directs workers opening bales and cases and inspecting cartons and pockets.
Oversees repacking of undamaged containers in cases and bales, and ensures specified code-marks are stamped on containers.
Directs workers dumping damaged sugar into barrels and hoppers and conveying containers to remelt hoppers.
Directs worker tending metal-detecting equipment that locates and removes metallic objects from damaged sugar.
Oversees return of bulk sugar from trucks to remelt station.
Keeps records, such as amounts of sugar processed, labor costs, and inventories.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L3 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
529.137-022 SUPERINTENDENT, GRAIN ELEVATOR (beverage; grain-feed mills)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in unloading, loading, storing, cleaning, and blending of grain for milling and shipment: Inspects sample of grain from incoming shipment to verify variety of grain with invoice and route to designated storage bin according to variety and protein content of grain.
Prepares switching orders for guidance of train crews in moving grain cars to unloading pits according to mill requirements.
Observes unloading and transportation of grain by bucket elevators and conveyors to storage tanks.
Inspects grain to determine cleaning requirements and directs processing of grain to prepare grain for milling.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.01.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L4 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
529.137-026 SUPERVISOR (tobacco)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in making or packing cigarettes or cigars: Inspects cigars, cigarettes, and filters to determine that length, circumference, firmness, printing of brand name, and gluing are according to specifications.
Observes machine operations to detect defective operation and product.
Schedules and coordinates work activities within cigar or cigarette making or packing lines and with other supervisors to maintain established production standards.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
May be designated according to department supervised as Supervisor, Cigar Processing (tobacco); Supervisor, Cigarette-Filter Making Department (tobacco); Supervisor, Cigarette-Making Department (tobacco); Supervisor, Cigarette-Packing Department (tobacco).
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 78
529.137-030 SUPERVISOR (oils 
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in processing oils, vegetables, and nuts, such as cottonseed, linseed, peanuts, palm kernels, and castor beans, used in manufacture of margarine, shortening, and other edible oils: Observes gauges and determines cooking time and temperature, according to equipment used and material to be processed, to ensure maintenance of quality and quantity standards.
Calculates, according to formula, adjustments to be made if laboratory analysis shows batch to be substandard.
Maintains production records and prepares reports for cost and production departments.
Patrols department to observe automatic equipment, such as hullers, separators, and crushing rolls, to ensure efficient operation.
May determine scrap reprocessing operations, according to condition of scrap, quality control specifications, and legal requirements.
May weigh random samples of margarine prints, using scale, to verify weight of prints against specifications and examine packaged product to verify brand names and code numbers against order.
May direct workers in refining and bleaching edible oils and be known as Refinery Supervisor (oils 
May direct workers in packaging operations and be known as Packaging Supervisor (oils 
May perform other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.01.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.137-034 SUPERVISOR, CIGAR TOBACCO PROCESSING (tobacco)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in receiving, sorting, sizing, conditioning, $T3mulling,$T1 and packing tobacco used in manufacture of cigars.
Examines tobacco to determine suitability of leaves for processing into wrapper or filler.
Trains new workers in equipment operation and work processes.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L2 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
529.137-038 SUPERVISOR, CURING ROOM (tobacco)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in blending, aging, and fermenting tobacco strips and stems in production of cigars, chewing tobacco, or snuff: Reads production schedules for information, such as quantity of stems, and strip tobacco, amounts of water and $T3casing fluid,$T1 and aging time specified.
Computes amount of tobacco strips and stems required to maintain production.
Analyzes thermometer readings of piles of tobacco to determine stages of fermentation, and schedules turning or transfer of tobacco cures.
Coordinates receipt of tobacco from supplier and transfer to drying department.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.137-042 SUPERVISOR, EGG PROCESSING (can.
&
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in processing eggs for shipment and storage: Schedules processing according to type of eggs ordered, delivery date, availability of eggs, and capacity of machines.
Informs MATERIAL HANDLERS (any industry) of number of cases to pack.
Verifies counting of eggs, preparation of receipts, and movement of eggs, according to company standards.
Directs workers in government and company sanitation regulations.
Inspects appearance and work methods of EGG CANDLER (any industry) and EGG BREAKER (any industry) for conformance to sanitation regulations.
Repairs or adjusts machinery.
Performs other duties as defined under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.01.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.137-046 SUPERVISOR, FRUIT GRADING (wholesale tr.)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in grading fruits: Trains employees in grading methods, detection of defective or improperly colored fruit, and other factors affecting standards.
Assigns workers to positions at grading belt.
Observes workers to correct discrepancies and ensure that graded fruit meets specified standards.
May interview and recommend hiring of new employees.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.03.02 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
529.137-050 SUPERVISOR, MAPLE PRODUCTS (food prep., nec)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in boiling, stirring, molding, and packing maple products, such as maple sugar and syrup.
Inspects product for conformance to prescribed standards of purity and appearance.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
529.137-054 SUPERVISOR, READY-MIXED FOOD PREPARATION (food prep., nec)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in processing ready-mixed food preparations: Requisitions ingredients from warehouse and prescribes mixing sequence.
Inspects ingredients and product to ensure conformance to company specifications and ensures that samples are taken of each batch mixed for quality control purposes.
Maintains record of ingredients used and batches mixed.
Trains new workers.
Performs duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.04.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
529.137-058 SUPERVISOR, SYRUP SHED (sugar 
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in blending edible sugar syrups, cleaning storage facilities and vehicle tanks, and filtering, pasteurizing and pumping syrups into tank trucks and railroad tank cars.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
529.137-062 SUPERVISOR, SPECIALTY FOOD PRODUCTS (can.
&
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in mixing, cooking, molding, and packaging speciality food products, such as frankfurters, chili, sausage, and fish roe: Reads production schedule to determine work procedures, supplies to be requisitioned, personnel requirements, and processing equipment to be used.
Assigns workers to work stations and issues instructions concerning formulas to follow and work procedures.
Coordinates flow of work between work stations.
Keeps production and timecard records.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
May supervise workers engaged in processing fish roe and be designated Supervisor, Roe Processing (can.
&
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L4 SVP: 8 DLU: 78
529.137-066 SUPERVISOR, WHIPPED TOPPING (dairy products)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in processing and packing whipped topping: Observes operations of equipment, such as versators, colloid mills, pasteurizers, cooling tanks, and homogenizers to verify conformance of whipped topping with quality and quantity standards.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.137-070 SUPERVISOR, YARD (beverage)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in blocking and icing loaded freight cars, manufacturing ice, and cleaning brewery yards: Trains workers.
Maintains specified amount of ice in storage.
Spots cars for workers to ice and block.
Directs movement of freight cars in yard.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.04.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L2 SVP: 8 DLU: 77
529.137-074 SUPERVISOR, INSPECTION (sugar 
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in inspecting chewing gum to ensure product conformance to processing standards: Reads production schedule and assigns duties to workers.
Observes inspection process to detect defective operations.
Reviews inspection reports to determine type and cause of product deviations from company standards.
Periodically reads instructions on batch cards to ensure ingredients meet formula specifications.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 86
529.137-078 SUPERVISOR, INSTANT POTATO PROCESSING (food prep., nec)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in cooking, blending, screening, and drying instant potato granules: Reviews shift specifications with supervisor to determine production goals, additives to be mixed with potato granules, and schedule for cleaning machinery.
Reviews shift logs to ascertain production delays encountered, such as machinery breakdown, production lines involved, and action taken.
Completes shift reports, and submits reports to management.
Instructs workers to fill storage tanks with instant potato granules according to type of granules produced, type of additives mixed with granules, and tank capacity.
Approves employee requests for vacation and forwards leave forms to personnel department.
Requests personnel department to provide substitute workers when regular workers are absent.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 86
529.137-082 SUPERVISOR, PROCESSING (sugar 
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in processing raw ingredients into chewing gum: Coordinates washing, melting, blending, mixing, and cooking of ingredients; rolling and scoring of gum into sheets; and coating of sheets with powdered sugar.
Trains new workers in operation of equipment.
Maintains inventory records and requisitions ingredients as necessary to meet production schedules.
Inspects and weighs ingredients to maintain establishment standards.
Confers with SUPERVISOR (sugar 
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 86
529.167-010 FRUIT COORDINATOR (can.
&
Coordinates flow of materials through departments of citrus-fruit processing plant.
Observes processing procedures and informs workers to speed up, slow down, or temporarily cease operations to maintain even flow of fruit through plant.
GOE: 05.09.02 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
529.281-010 TASTER (food prep., nec)
Tastes samples of food or beverages to determine palatability of product or to prepare blending formulas: Cooks or brews small lots of beverages or other food products and tastes product to determine grade, approximate market value, or acceptability to consumer tastes.
Writes blending formulas for guidance of workers who prepare food products in commercial quantities.
May purchase food products.
May be designated according to product tasted as Coffee Taster (food prep., nec); Tea Taster (food prep., nec).
GOE: 06.01.05 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L4 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.361-010 ALMOND-PASTE MIXER (sugar 
Mixes and cooks blanched, ground, and refined almonds with sugar solution to make marzipan (almond paste) for candy centers.
Dumps ingredients into steam-jacketed rotating cooker.
Transfers cooked batch to water-cooled kettle.
May operate refining machine to reduce particle size of cooked batch.
GOE: 06.01.04 STRENGTH: M GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 8 DLU: 77
529.361-014 CANDY MAKER (sugar 
Mixes and cooks candy ingredients by following, modifying, or formulating recipes to produce product of specified flavor, texture, and color: Cooks ingredients [CONFECTIONERY COOKER (sugar 
Casts candy by hand, using molds and funnel, or tends machine that casts candy in starch or rubber molds [DEPOSITING-MACHINE OPERATOR (sugar 
Spreads candy onto cooling and heating slabs.
Kneads and machine-pulls candy [CANDY PULLER (sugar 
Spins or rolls candy into strips ready for cutting [SPINNER (sugar 
Examines, feels, and tastes product to evaluate color, texture, and flavor.
Adds ingredients or modifies cooking and forming operations as needed.
May direct CANDY-MAKER HELPERS (sugar 
May be designated according to type of candy produced as Caramel-Candy Maker (sugar 
GOE: 06.02.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R4 M3 L4 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.361-018 CHEESEMAKER (dairy products) alternate titles: cheese cooker
Cooks milk and specified ingredients to make cheese, according to formula: Pasteurizes and separates milk to obtain prescribed butterfat content.
Turns valves to fill vat with milk and heat milk to specified temperature.
Dumps measured amounts of dye and starter into milk.
Starts agitator to mix ingredients.
Tests sample of milk for acidity and allows agitator to mix ingredients until specified level of acidity is reached.
Dumps and mixes measured amount of rennet into milk.
Stops agitator to allow milk to coagulate into curd.
Pulls curd knives through curd or separates curd with hand scoop to release whey.
Observes thermometer, adjusts steam valve, and starts agitator to stir and cook curd at prescribed temperature for specified time.
Squeezes and stretches sample of curd with fingers and extends cooking time to achieve desired firmness or texture.
Gives directions to CHEESEMAKER HELPER (dairy products) or other workers to make curd, drain whey from curd, add ingredients, such as seasonings, or mold, pack, cut, pile, mill, dump, and press curd into specified shapes.
Directs other workers who immerse cheese in brine or roll cheese in dry salt, pierce or smear cheese with cultured wash to develop mold growth, and place or turn cheese blocks on shelves to cure cheese.
Tastes, smells, feels, and observes sample plug of cheese for quality.
Records amounts of ingredients used, test results, and time cycles.
Makes variations in time cycles and ingredients used for succeeding batches.
Dumps specified culture into milk or whey in pasteurizer to make bulk starter.
May be required to hold state cheesemaker's license.
GOE: 06.01.04 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L4 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.362-010 BUTTERMAKER (dairy products)
Controls equipment to make grades of butter by either of following methods: (1) Butter churn method: Connects sanitary pipe between cream storage vat and churn.
Starts pump to convey sterile solution through equipment and to admit measured amount of pasteurized cream into churn, and starts churn.
Observes separation of buttermilk from butter and pumps buttermilk from churn.
Opens churn and sprays butter with chlorinated water to remove residue buttermilk.
Compares butter with color chart and adds coloring to meet specifications.
Tests butter for moisture, salt content, and consistency, using testing apparatus, and achieves specified consistency by adding or removing water.
Examines, smells, and tastes butter to grade it according to prescribed standard.
(2) Butter chilling method: Pasteurizes and separates cream to obtain butter oil, and tests butter oil in standardizing vat for butter fat, moisture, salt content, and acidity, using testing apparatus.
Adds water, alkali, and coloring to butter oil to achieve specified grade, and starts agitator to mix ingredients.
Turns valves and observes gauges to regulate temperature and flow of water, refrigerant, and butter oil through chilling vat.
Smells, tastes, and feels sample to grade butter emerging from chilling vat.
May be designated according to equipment operated as Butter-Chilling Equipment Operator (dairy products); Butter Churner (dairy products).
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R3 M3 L2 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
529.362-014 DRY-STARCH OPERATOR, AUTOMATIC (grain-feed mills)
Controls equipment that produces dry starch products from raw starch, and tests product for adherence to specifications: Dumps bags of chemicals into mixing tanks, and turns valves to admit fluids to prepare slurries for treating raw starch.
Regulates material flow, and starts and controls pumps, heaters, agitators, shakers, filters, driers, and related equipment, following standard procedures.
Monitors gauges and recording instruments to ensure standard operating conditions.
Directs other workers in operating equipment in event of malfunction.
Obtains samples of product at various stages of process to test for viscosity, acidity, and specific gravity, using viscometer, pH meter, and hydrometer.
Records instrument readings and other data on daily log.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
529.367-010 CIGARETTE-AND-FILTER CHIEF INSPECTOR (tobacco)
Examines plain or filter-tipped cigarettes or filters to ensure that quality of product conforms to standards: Inspects cigarettes or filters produced to detect imperfections, such as loose ends, stems, stemholes, defective glue lines, and defectively attached filters.
Examines cigarettes, attached filters, and filters rejected by CIGARETTE-MAKING-MACHINE CATCHER (tobacco) and CIGARETTE INSPECTOR (tobacco) and discards inferior products.
Notifies CIGARETTE-MAKING-MACHINE OPERATOR (tobacco) of deviations from standards.
Records number of cigarettes found with defects and compiles summary production sheets.
Verifies and totals figures posted by CIGARETTE INSPECTOR (tobacco).
GOE: 06.03.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
529.367-014 HOGSHEAD INSPECTOR (tobacco)
Examines hogsheads and bales of tobacco after ordering process to determine whether temperature and quality of tobacco conform to standards: Places thermometer in tobacco and records temperature of each lot.
Inspects tobacco for damage.
Removes damaged tobacco, weighs, and records amount damaged.
Notifies supervisor when temperature or condition of tobacco does not meet standards.
Verifies weight of hogsheads and bales against checksheet.
GOE: 06.03.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
529.367-018 QUALITY-CONTROL INSPECTOR (bakery products)
Weighs and tests cookies and crackers for conformance to quality and weight standards: Gathers random packages of cookies or crackers from each conveyor line and weighs packages on platform scale to verify weight specifications.
Adds crumbled crackers to chemical solution to ascertain level of acidity or alkalinity, using pH meter, or compares color of solution with color chart.
Records weight of crackers or cookies, and places crumbs in drier.
Turns on drying unit for specified time to remove moisture from crumbs.
Weighs dried crumbs to ascertain moisture content.
Records results of tests in record book and reports variations from weight standards.
May verify weight of individual packages during packing process.
GOE: 06.03.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
529.367-022 QUALITY-CONTROL TECHNICIAN (beverage)
Compiles taste preference data on whiskeys for use by laboratory personnel as aid to developing improved methods of producing and storing distilled liquors: Requests samples of whiskey from warehouse or bottling workers for tasting and laboratory analysis, according to brand of whiskey and serial numbers of barrels from which samples are to be taken.
Records proof and weight of whiskey and date whiskey was placed in storage.
Schedules designated persons to taste various brands of standard quality whiskey and brand to be bottled.
Fills glasses with whiskeys for tasting by panel members.
Prepares reports indicating number of like and unlike comparisons, date sample tasting was made, brand of whiskey, and serial numbers of barrels from which sample was taken, and submits information to laboratory.
Attaches labels to bottles of whiskey samples and routes bottles to laboratory for analysis.
GOE: 05.09.02 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M3 L2 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
529.367-026 ROUGH-RICE GRADER (grain-feed mills)
Grades unhulled rice visually as it is unloaded from freight cars or trucks, and directs workers in storage of rice according to grade: Obtains samples from each carload or truckload, using probe.
Examines samples and determines grade of each load according to amount of damaged grains and grass seed content.
Directs workers in conveying rice to storage bins to ensure that each grade is stored separately.
Records amount and grade of rice received.
GOE: 06.03.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
529.367-030 YIELD-LOSS INSPECTOR (grain-feed mills)
Inspects operating condition of machinery and equipment used in manufacture of stock feed, starch, sugar, and liquid sugar products to detect potential sources for loss of product: Examines valves, pipe connections, conveyors, pumps, and equipment assemblies for potential malfunction and cause of leakage, spillage, overflow, and excessive dusting.
Takes samples from process streams, such as wash water and waste disposal lines, to laboratory for test of product content.
Prepares periodic reports of inspection findings.
Participates in special studies, such as grain moisture and sewer sampling surveys, reviews new sampling methods and procedures, and makes suggestions to improve yield loss inspection procedures.
GOE: 06.03.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
529.367-034 QUALITY CONTROL INSPECTOR (sugar 
Inspects bagging, storage, and shipping facilities for conformance to company sanitation and safety standards in beet sugar refinery: Monitors indicator lights and weighs randomly selected sugar bags from packaging line conveyor to verify accuracy of automatic weighing equipment.
Pulls lever to adjust fill rate of equipment when sample bags are over or under specified weight.
Inspects boxcars for cleanliness and to ascertain valves and hatches are closed and sealed.
Obtains sugar samples from bulk car for laboratory analysis, using probe.
Inspects warehouse areas to detect unsafe or unsanitary conditions, such as lubricants on walkways and cracks in storage bins.
Informs designated person of conditions requiring immediate repair, such as unsanitary condition of boxcars and warehouse areas.
Completes reports that indicate condition of boxcars, warehouse area, and incoming shipments of brown sugar and starch.
GOE: 06.03.01 STRENGTH: H GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 7 DLU: 86
529.381-010 COMPOUNDER, FLAVORINGS (beverage)
Compounds natural or synthetic flavorings from liquid and solid ingredients, according to formula: Selects prescribed ingredients and measures or weighs ingredients, using English or metric measures and balance scales.
Determines mixing sequence, in kettles, placed on floor scales, or in weigh tanks, based on knowledge of temperature effects, and solubility and miscibility properties of specific ingredients.
Stirs mixture with paddle or uses agitator.
Homogenizes material to prevent separation of substances, using homogenizing device.
Maintains record of batches prepared.
GOE: 06.02.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
529.382-010 BUTTERMAKER, CONTINUOUS CHURN (dairy products)
Operates continuous churn to produce butter of specified grade and quality, and performs quality control tests: Starts agitator of salt injector and fills tank of injector with salt solution.
Turns valve control and starts pump to move cream from storage tank to churn.
Presses switches to start beater and extruders of churn, and adjusts controls while monitoring gauge and ammeter to regulate churn speed.
Connects salt injector tube to extruder of churn and starts salt injector pump.
Raises or lowers nozzle to adjust height of buttermilk drainpipe to control level of buttermilk in extruder, using wrenches.
Observes butter granules dropping from beater section to ensure that beater is operating efficiently.
Removes sample of butter from discharge of churn and performs standardized tests for moisture, butterfat, and color content.
Tastes butter to detect undesirable flavors and to ensure required salt level.
Rubs sample of butter between thumb and finger to determine if texture meets specifications.
Turns control knobs to adjust speed of beater, speed of salt pump, height of buttermilk discharge pipe, or adds vegetable color to salt solution to ensure butter meets specifications.
Observes and listens to churn to detect possible malfunctions, such as leaks or plugging, and reports malfunctions or undesirable taste to supervisor.
Mixes salt and water, according to formula, to maintain stock of solution.
Records production and test data on record sheet.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L3 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
529.382-014 CHOCOLATE-PRODUCTION-MACHINE OPERATOR (sugar 
Operates any of following machines and equipment to relieve regular operators engaged in processing cocoa beans into chocolate liquor and in producing cocoa powder and sweet chocolate, according to formula: Controls roaster that roasts cocoa beans to develop specified color and flavor and reduces moisture content of beans [COCOA-BEAN ROASTER (sugar 
I; COCOA-BEAN ROASTER (sugar 
Tends mill to grind nibs (cracked cocoa beans) into liquid chocolate of specified fineness [LIQUOR-GRINDING-MILL OPERATOR (sugar 
Tends hydraulic press to extract cocoa butter from chocolate liquor, and operates cocoa room machinery and equipment to grind and pulverize cocoa cakes into cocoa powder [COCOA-PRESS OPERATOR (sugar 
Mixes ingredients, such as chocolate liquor, sugar, and powdered milk to make sweet chocolate [MIXER OPERATOR (sugar 
Operates refining machine to grind chocolate paste to specified consistency [REFINING-MACHINE OPERATOR (sugar 
Operates tempering equipment to control temperature of chocolate in cooling process before molding [CHOCOLATE TEMPERER (bakery products; grain-feed mills)].
May tend molding machines, pressure cookers, and dryers.
May assist in supervising and training production line workers.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
529.382-018 DAIRY-PROCESSING-EQUIPMENT OPERATOR (dairy products)
Operates continuous flow or vat-type equipment to process milk, cream, and other dairy products, following specified methods and formulas: Connects pipes between vats and processing equipment.
Assembles fittings, valves, bowls, plates, disks, impeller shaft, and other parts to equipment with wrench to prepare for operation.
Turns valves to pump sterilizing solution and rinse water through pipes and equipment and spray vats with atomizer.
Starts pumps and equipment, observes temperature and pressure gauges, and opens valves on continuous flow equipment to force milk through centrifuge to separate cream from milk, through homogenizer to produce specified emulsion, and through filter to remove sediment.
Turns valves to admit steam and water into pipes to pasteurize milk and to circulate refrigerant through coils to cool milk.
Starts pump and agitator, observes pressure and temperature gauges, and opens valves on vat equipment to fill, stir, and steam-heat milk in vat.
Pumps or pours specified amounts of liquid or powder ingredients, such as skim milk, lactic culture, stabilizer, neutralizer, and vitamins into vat to make dairy products, such as buttermilk, chocolate milk, or ice cream mix.
Tests product for acidity at various stages of processing.
Records specified time, temperature, pressure, and volume readings.
May be designated according to process performed as Byproducts Maker (dairy products); Clarifier Operator (dairy products); Cooler Operator (dairy products); Homogenizer Operator (dairy products); Mix Maker (dairy products); Pasteurizer Operator (dairy products); Separator Operator (dairy products).
May be required to hold license from State Board of Health or local government unit.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
529.382-022 GELATIN MAKER, UTILITY (chemical)
Performs any combination of following duties to relieve other workers in producing gelatin or glue from animal stock (skins, splits, fleshings, and trimmings): Tends equipment to wash animal stock used to make gelatin and glue [WASH-MILL OPERATOR (chemical)] and lime vats to loosen hair and open pores of stock [LIMER (chemical; leather mfg.)]
Tends equipment to cook stock for broth [COOK (chemical)], and operates evaporator to dehydrate broth to concentrate gelatin contents [EVAPORATOR OPERATOR (chemical) I]
Tends press to filter impurities from gelatin or glue [FILTER-PRESS OPERATOR (any industry)].
Tends equipment to spread gelatin or glue into sheets for drying [SPREADING-MACHINE OPERATOR (chemical)] and equipment that grinds, weighs, and packages gelatin or glue [GLUE-MILL OPERATOR (chemical)]
GOE: 06.02.18 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M1 L2 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
529.382-026 HYDROGENATION OPERATOR (oils 
Controls equipment to process base oils used in manufacture of margarine and shortening: Starts pumps to move premeasured batches of refined oils or fats into converter vessel.
Turns valves to adjust rate of flow of hydrogen, steam, air, and water into converter, and weighs and adds specified amounts of catalytic agents and other chemicals to harden batch of oils or fats, as required.
Tests samples of batch to ensure that hardness of product is in accordance with specifications, using refractometer.
Pumps hardened oils through filter press to remove catalyst and attaches lines to transfer filtered oil to blending vessel.
Starts pump to add specified amounts of blending oils to blending vessel and turns valves to heat and blend oils for required amount of time.
Observes temperature and pressure gauges, and turns valves to make adjustment when necessary.
Pumps finished oils through filter press to holding tank.
May be designated according to equipment controlled as Blender (oils 
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
529.382-030 IRISH-MOSS OPERATOR (chemical) alternate titles: drying-machine operator; weed-cooking operator
Operates centrifugal separator, pressure cooker, drum drier, hammer mill, and air separator to process Irish moss (carrageen) into powdered stabilizer used in food processing: Pumps boiled mixture from holding tank into centrifugal separator and starts machine to separate moss from mixture.
Pumps mixture from centrifuge to pressure cooker.
Weighs out and adds specified amounts of powdered ingredients.
Turns steam valve and observes pressure gauges on pressure cooker to cook mixture for specified time.
Pumps mixture to drier and turns valve to heat drier to prescribed temperature and reduce product to solid form.
Starts screw conveyor to carry mixture out of drier through hammer mill and air separator to pulverize and deposit product in containers for storage.
May draw sample of product and perform tests, using meters, or submit sample for testing.
GOE: 06.02.11 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L1 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
529.385-010 NOODLE MAKER (food prep., nec)
Tends series of machines that mix, knead, roll, and cut dough to make noodles: Weighs and measures specified ingredients according to standard formulas, and dumps them into mixing machine.
Moves lever to empty mixed ingredients into kneading machine.
Feeds kneaded dough into rolling machine that forms dough into sheet and winds sheet into roll.
Turns knob to regulate roller clearance and dusts rolled sheet with cornstarch.
Inserts end of sheet into feed rollers of cutting machine that slits sheet into strands.
Slides rod under emerging strands to drape strands over rod.
Pulls lever to cut strands to specified length and hangs filled rod on rack.
Pushes rack into drying room, and sets thermostat to specified temperature.
Feels and observes consistency of product throughout operation to control quality and processing time.
May cut noodles into packaging lengths, using knife.
May weigh and wrap noodles in cellophane or pack them in cartons.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
529.387-010 CHEESE GRADER (dairy products)
Evaluates and grades body, texture, flavor, and color of natural cheese: Pushes trier into cheese to obtain sample plug.
Smells and tastes cheese for odor, acidity, and flavor.
Examines cheese with fingers to determine firmness and texture.
Observes cheese for color, shape, size, finish, and surface blemishes.
Records weight, grade, and identifying data.
Must hold state or federal license.
May buy cheese and assist with production problems.
GOE: 06.03.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
529.387-014 CIGARETTE TESTER (tobacco) alternate titles: tester operator
Tests cigarettes and cellophane wrappers to ensure that products conform to company standards, according to following methods: (1) Feeds sample from cigarette-making machine into hopper of weight recorder that tallies weight of each cigarette and totals number of each weight.
Computes average weight of cigarettes in sample and compares average weight with standard to determine deviations.
(2) Slits cigarette paper, dumps tobacco into container, and places container in electric moisture meter to obtain moisture content [MOISTURE-METER OPERATOR (tobacco) 529.687-162].
(3) Weighs tobacco from specified number of cigarettes and places tobacco in agitator equipped with series of screens to separate shreds according to size.
Weighs separate tobacco and determines percentage of each size of shreds in single cigarette, using conversion table.
(4) Removes cellophane wrapper from cigarette pack and tests resistance to air by slipping wrapper over suction device of instrument that draws air through wrapper and indicates amount of airflow.
Records test finding, date, and machine number from which samples were taken.
GOE: 06.03.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M3 L3 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
529.387-018 FRUIT-BUYING GRADER (can.
&
Examines, sorts, and grades sample fruit from load at receiving point: Takes random samples from load, weighs sample and containers, and calculates net weight and tare of total load.
Sorts sample fruit by grade and size, according to company or government specifications.
Weighs each portion of sample and calculates percentage of each size and grade in total load.
Issues grade ticket or receipt for load.
GOE: 06.03.01 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M3 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
529.387-022 GAUGER (beverage)
Tests wine samples for alcohol content, acidity, and sugar content, using hydrometer, thermometer, and other laboratory equipment: Collects samples of wine from tanks for tests.
Immerses hydrometer and thermometer in wine sample and compares readings with gauging manual to determine alcohol content.
Pours specified amount of wine in glass cylinder and inserts hydrometer to determine sugar content.
Measures sample for acid content, using chemicals and gauges.
Examines sample for quality of color.
Drafts charts and writes test reports.
GOE: 06.03.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
529.387-026 INSPECTOR, GRAIN MILL PRODUCTS (grain-feed mills) alternate titles: inspector technician
Weighs packaged cereal, feed, and flour products to verify weights and examines packages for adequacy of labeling, stamping, sewing, or sealing: Records weights on report form.
Tests scales for accuracy, using standard weights, and adjusts scales.
Compares sample of mixed feed with standard sample to verify adequacy of mixing or pelletizing process.
Obtains and labels samples of flour grades produced and delivers them to laboratory.
May review laboratory analysis of flour samples.
May verify production reports with report of quantity of packed products received in warehouse and trace reason for discrepancies.
GOE: 06.03.01 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
529.387-030 QUALITY-CONTROL TECHNICIAN (can.
&
Inspects raw materials and finished products, and tests and adjusts packaging or canning equipment during processing of foods, such as corn chips, vegetables, and breaded shrimp: Inspects, tests, weighs, tastes, and smells raw materials and finished products to determine such information as spoilage, whether cans, packages, or jars have vacuum seal, pH content of specified products, and weight of sample products, using equipment such as vacuum gauge, pH meter, and weight scal
